Eating an organic diet for a week can cause pesticide levels to drop by almost 90% in adults, research from RMIT University has found. The study, led by Dr Liza Oates found particpants’ urinary dialkylphosphates (DAPs) measurements were 89% lower when they ate an organic diet for seven days compared to a conventional diet for the same amount of time. DAPs make up 70% to 80% of organophosphate pesticides. Dr Oates said having the same people experience a large drop in organophosphate pesticide levels when consuming organic foods as opposed to conventional foods suggested most of these pesticides come from food consumption. However, she recognised it could come from other sources. The people in the organic phase (of the study) still did have some exposure, so there are obviously some alternate routes of exposure, she said. Make better decisions - find out what the experts think. This idea was supported by University of Adelaide toxicologist Dr Ian Musgrave. We’re exposed to pesticide residues in a number of ways, he said. The study is quite good in the way they exposed food exposure, but the possibility is there are other explanations for why they’re seeing this. Dr Musgrave said people who lived outside of urban areas often had higher exposures to pesticide, despite the fact that they were less likely to be consuming vast quantities of pesticide-contaminated food. Dr Oates said people can be exposed to pesticides through inhalation and skin absorption. There is some emerging research suggesting some links between chronic low-dose exposure to OPs and some issues with the nervous system and that’s not surprising because the activities of these agents is they are toxic to the nervous system to humans, she said. A lot of these agents were initially developed as nerve gases for chemical warfare, so we do know they have toxic effects on the nervous system at high doses. What’s less clear is at what dose they’re considered to be completely safe and that’s probably very different for different individuals depending on other factors like their ability to eliminate and detoxify these chemicals. Dr Musgrave said pesticide exposure was not a concern for many Australians. More than half of these people had no detectable pesticides in them or no quantifiable pesticides so the risk is already fairly low. The levels we see in urinary excretions from a variety of Australian populations suggests that the vast majority of people who are not working in industrial occupations that involve spaying of OPs are exposed to well below this no-effect level. University of New South Wales visiting fellow and nutritionist Rosemary Stanton said the study may indicate organic food is a healthier option. It could if repeated in a much larger sample with more details, she said. Evidence is being published to support organic food production. Dr Oates said the participants’ diets were rigorously kept in check. We had a fairly detailed diet diary which we had previously piloted on another group of people. We asked people if their sources were certified organic or 'likely organic'. During the organic phase the participants consumed, on average, 93% organic food. That includes certified and 'likely organic sources. 'Dr Oates said 83% of the participants’ organic diets were made up of certified organic food, meaning only 10% was likely organic' food. Organic food is an over-hyped and overpriced fad, according to many people. But a recently published study which followed nearly 69,000 French people over four and a half years seems to indicate there is a link between eating organic foods and a lower cancer risk. The study found the regular eaters of 16 types of organic products were protected against several cancers by about a quarter. The foods included fruit, vegetables, bread, flour, eggs, meat and cereals. More than 20% of EU land is now allocated for organic farming and the organic sector is booming. But until now there has been no clear consensus on whether eating organic food is worth the extra cost. So is it time to throw out all your fruit and veg and only shop organic in the future? Going organic The study suggests people who regularly eat organic plant foods have a reduction in risk of common cancers. The data also shows a reduction for breast cancer after the menopause – but not before. Start your day with evidence-based news. But while these results suggest a relationship, it is a long way from proof. This is because the study itself was too short and has the usual biases of observational designs – in that people who are healthier are more likely to eat healthier foods. And while the authors adjusted for body weight, social class and educational level, as well as other differences, and still found a consistent effect, the possibility of bias still remains on any single observational study. The results, however are most convincing for a reduction in cancer of the immune system called Non-Hodgkin’s lymphoma. This is because two previous studies (also longitudinal and observational) – the largest being a study of 680,000 women over nine years – also showed the same preventive effects. The fact that all three studies show a reduction of risk for this type of cancer (by chance or bias alone) is more indicative that there could be a link between organic eating and a lower cancer risk. Herbicides and health There is no hard evidence that the taste or nutrient differences (fibre, vitamins and minerals) of organic vegetables are very different to regular varieties – although analysis suggests they contain more polyphenols. These are compounds that often give plants their colour and provide antioxidant defences and are generally beneficial for human health. In the US and Europe, fruits and vegetables are regularly sprayed with a range of pesticides and herbicides. Organic plants do still have detectable levels of herbicides and pesticides, but they are five times lower than non-organic products. Many common fruits and cereals such as oats often have high levels – which aren’t reduced much by washing or peeling. So it could well be that ingesting chemically treated plants over years may actually increase some cancers. A US jury, for example, recently awarded millions of dollars in damages to a groundsman with Non-Hodgkin’s lymphoma who regularly used the weed killer Glyphosate (Roundup). This weedkiller is widely used around the world and in more than five million acres of farmland in the UK alone. The government and the EU maintains that these chemicals are safe for humans at doses found in food. But the safety thresholds are based on old-fashioned lab animal data – where rodents are given doses a thousand times higher and see if they develop extra cancers. The safety tests for foods and chemicals have not changed for decades and do not include the long-term effects, for example, on our gut microbiomes. A gut issue We have 100 trillion microbes in our lower intestines that make up a community that are crucial for the immune system and for the body’s response to cancer and cancer therapies – such as immunotherapy for melanoma. These microbes and their genes are much more sensitive to chemicals than we are, and this can lead to disruption in their metabolism and the chemicals they produce. This new knowledge of the importance of a healthy gut microbiome casts doubt on official advice that all pesticides and herbicides are safe for us over long periods of time. And greater scrutiny of the safety of these widely used chemicals in our foods needs to be carried out in well-funded clinical trials – over years, not weeks. There may of course be no direct effects on humans. But, as yet, no one has provided evidence to show that such chemicals are not harmful long-term for our immune system. So, while the risks for individuals are likely to be low, until we know for sure, for those who like eating lots of plants, spending a bit more for organic fruit and veg (and porridge oats) may be a price worth paying to keep your gut microbes healthy. I've invested a lot of my own money into organic and sustainable farming, and to converting American farmland to organic, and I'm here to dispel some misperceptions about organic food. There is this prevailing notion that organic farming is more expensive and less sufficient, right? And that we need industrial agriculture and factory farms to feed the world. "Feed the world." Well, I'm here to dissect some of the assumptions behind that logic, and to share some information that leads to a very different conclusion. Organic food is expensiveWe all know organic food is expensive. This is a fact. And it's logical to therefore assume that it's for the 1%, the foodie elites, the rich people, not for ordinary people. Well, that's actually not correct logic, and I will show why in a second. It also leads us to assume that if organic food is expensive, organic farming must be more expensive, which then leads to wonder, surely, it can't feed the world, and back to concluding that it's only for the 1%. Well, those assumptions actually are wrong as well. The idea that organic food is only for the rich, only for the 1% is a powerful one, with huge implications on both business and policy. And we need both business innovation and policy change in this country to support organic. Think about it, if you are a business person or a politician, the way to be successful is to come up with products or policies that cater not to the 1% but to ordinary Americans. And so we need businessmen and policy makers to recognize that organic food is not just for the 1%, it's for everybody, it's for ordinary Americans. And the first step in that change is to change that perception. Who is buying organic food So, who is buying this expensive organic food? Who in America is buying it? According to Nielsen and NMI research, three out of every four Americans have consciously chosen to buy organic food in the past year. Some of them might have only bought a single organic product, but there is a subset that there are the so-called devoted organic shoppers, that represent the vast majority of all organic food consumption in this country. These so-called foodies are not 1%, they are 25%, one out of every four Americans. Now let's look at these elite foodies. What does the elite foodie look like? Two out of five of them have an annual household income of less than 50,000 dollars. One out of five has an annual household income of less than 30,000 dollars. These elite people are about 20% people of color, and another 15% Hispanic. Six out of ten of them shop at Walmart. How does that profile compare to the general U.S. population? It's exactly the same. The general U.S. population is about two out of five income less than 50K, one out of five income less than 30K. About 20% people of color, 15% Hispanic, and about six out of ten shop at Walmart. In every respect, the foodie elite who are buying organic are the average ordinary American. And it's one out of four Americans, Why is organic food expensive and they're already buying organic in spite of how expensive it is. Just imagine how many more Americans would be buying organic food if it wasn't so damn expensive. Well, we actually know some of the answers to that. Walmart asked its consumers and found that 91% of them would be buying organic. So, why is organic food so darn expensive? It must be because organic farming is more expensive, right? Not true; organic farming actually saves a ton of money on a lot of very expensive inputs. Fossil fuel is expensive. Fertilizers are incredibly expensive. The chemicals, the antibiotics that are used by factory farms. These things are very expensive. Not just their externalized costs, but their actual dollar costs are very high. Well, so maybe organic farming saves money but perhaps it produces less food. That's not necessarily true either. This is not a blanket statement, it varies by crop and region, but there are lot of ways in which, when done right, organic sustainable farming can produce more food. One part of that is crop and livestock rotations, so that nutrients are recycled into the soil. Growing multiple crops at the same time, increasing the revenue of the land. Exploiting natural synergies. One of my favorites examples of this is sheep and asparagus. Sheep love to graze but they do not like the taste of asparagus. And so, when the asparagus farmer has a weed problem, rather than spending a lot of money buying a chemical herbicide to spray in the fields, they can invite in a sheep farmer. The sheep will clear the weeds. The sheep farmer gets free pasture for his or her animals, and the asparagus farmer gets free weed control. And, the sheep add fertility to the soil. You must be thinking: "Well, great, but industrial agriculture, for all of its ills, surely at least the one thing it has is that it's more efficient, right?" I would say that it has the illusion of efficiency, and it's a short-lived one. Soil For example, think about the topsoil. America's topsoil, perhaps the single, greatest national treasure this country possesses, this rich topsoil, is like a bank account that we're drawing on every year. Withdrawing money and not putting it back in. That's not efficient. It's inefficient and unsustainable. Similarly, the way we treat nutrients. Nutrients are supposed to come from the soil, go through the body of a plant, into the body of an animal, and back into the soil. We all learned that in high school. And that's not how the vast majority of North American agriculture works today. Instead, we're mining minerals in Morroco, shipping them across the Atlantic, spraying them on the fields, only to have them wash off into the waterways, and end up in dead zones, and places like the Gulf of Mexico. That's not efficient, it's incredibly wasteful. Not just ecologically, but economically. Antibiotics Similarly, what I said earlier about fossil fuels, antibiotics to feed the factory farm animals. And all of this to increase the yield of corn and soy. Crops that humans don't even actually eat. We're maximizing the yield per acre of corn and soy, yet the vast majority of American farmland does not feed humans. It's either used to create ethanol or to feed livestock. About less than 10% of the corn crop in this country actually goes to feed humans. This is the system that is supposed to feed the world? Well, it's actually not feeding the world today. If you measure, the right way to measure productivity in agriculture is not the yield of corn per acre or soy per acre, but the yield of human food per acre. And when you measure how much human food is produced per acre, America is not a leader. We're not even average. We're behind the world average, and we're behind countries like India and China, that are making a much better job of feeding the world population than we are. So, if you were smart, you would realize what's really behind that status is the fact that these other countries consume less meat that America does. And, so, who is going to produce all the increasing appetite for pork in China, And surely, American industrial agriculture and factory farms are going to step forward to supply all the meat. Well, I'm not sure that's true either. The leading exporter of pork in the world today is Denmark. Denmark is a country that has for many years banned the use of sub-therapeutic antibiotics in livestock. One of the most disgusting and reckless practices of American factory farms has been banned in Denmark, yet Denmark has continued to maintain high yields and low prices for their pork, and is the number one exporter of pork to places like China. Efficiency Ironically, China has recently banned pork imports from several U.S. pork producers because of the use of antibiotics. The real question though is: What's the most efficient way to produce food if people are going to eat more meat? Well, if you look at one acre of corn, it can produce about enough corn to feed one head of cattle. This is an approximation, this is not very exact math. That same acre-I wouldn't advocate planting organic corn to feed the cattle - that same acre can produce about enough grass to feed one head of cattle. Now, it's not an exact math. I'm approximating, and there is a lot of other things that change the equation. Corn is a more efficient crop in a lot of ways. It's a wonderful crop, it allows for a lot more control, it has less seasonality, but it also has a lot of other costs on the balance sheet. At the end of the day, it's not a slam dunk that industrial agriculture is more efficient, even for producing meat. Now, the truly more efficient way to feed humans is to use that land to produce crops that people eat, like fruits, vegetables, wheat or rice. But the benefit of growing meat on pasture is at least those animals fertilize the land, and if you do a rotation between those animals and fruits and vegetables, you can actually produce more off that same land. It must be about the money then, right? These so called evil corporations like McDonald's and Monsanto. Perhaps they are shoving this industrial food down our throats because it's more profitable, right? Well, that's actually not true either. In fact, using the techniques I just described, Farmland LP, - which I'm a very large investor in - converts farms from conventional crops to organic, and significantly increases their profits. They've done a cohort analysis of farmland that they've been progressively converting to organic, and in doing so, significantly raising the income from the land, from something like 100 dollars to 450 dollars per acre. You might think: "Well, that's great but perhaps it can't scale." Well, the answer is actually organic and sustainable agriculture is scaling. For one thing, Chipotle, which is the closest we have to a fast food organic company, is the single fastest growing fast-food company of the past decade. And, more broadly, organic cropland in the U.S. has grown tremendously, more than tripling in less than two decades. So, organic saves money, is less expensive, can produce as much or more food, is more profitable, and is scaling. Then, what the... why the heck is organic food so expensive? And the answer is because the demand for organic food is growing even faster. That graph of organic cropland growing is still a drop in the bucket, and it pales compared to the surge in demand for organic sustainable food in this country. The total amount of organic cropland in America is about 1% of this country's agricultural land. The total amount of consumption of organic food is between 4 and 5%, and that does not even reflect the total demand. That's how much has actually been consumed. One out of every four Americans is a devoted organic shopper, and 91% of Walmart customers say they would be interested in buying organic food. The demand that we need to satisfy is not just that 5%. But you might wonder where is that 4 or 5% of organic food coming from if not from our cropland? It's being imported. And where is organic food growing on this planet? In developing countries. 80% of the certified organic farmers are in developing countries. The country with the most organic farmers is actually India. So, the poor countries of the world are feeding the food that the majority of want to eat. So, I think America should stop worrying so much about feeding the world, and focus a little bit more on feeding itself. The solution to this is actually relatively simple. We need organic sustainably managed cropland in this country to increase dramatically, to catch up with the enormous demand. I put my own money where my mouth is, and I've invested a lot of money in Farmland LP as I mentioned, which is converting land to organic, and I think we need both policy change, and more business innovation to accelerate the expansion of sustainable organic agriculture in America. Thanks very much. and there's actually something called the shikamite pathway which is the the nutrient uptake system that is built in to every plant and the way roundup is designed roundup is the chemical you just alluded to it's ubiquitous in our food system it literally stunts that chicken mite pathway so it literally inhibits the plant's ability to uptake nutrients now how backward is that thinking that we would that we would apply a chemical that literally inhibits the plant's ability to uptake nutrients and you know why it's so important is even even though even if you're eating vegetables and you're trying to eat a plant-rich diet if you're eating traditional food you're actually getting far less nutrients than you did 50 years ago we have far less levels of magnesium zinc all these all the incredible important nutrients that we need to function as human beings we are depleted and that's why we see massive nutritional deficiency yes it's the junk food and the ultra processed food but it's also the the depletion of our soils where your your you know broccoli and your vegetables have 50 less minerals and nutrients than they did 50 years ago and what you're saying is our organic and regenerative organic actually help to correct that and help us rebuild the soils which then helps the plants grow healthy which then creates healthy humans so this whole healthy soil healthy plants healthy healthy humans is such an important simple idea but it's it's amazing how it's ignored and our current agricultural system produces commodity crops that aren't nutrient dense they're they're bred for starch they're bred for yield they're bred for being able to be used in industrial food products they're not they're not made to create healthy humans and that is such an aha for me when you think gee if we can have one guiding principle in our entire federal policy and state and agricultural policies it should be that quality is king. In recent years there has been a rising interest in organic foods, as more people look for healthier and more sustainable dietary options. There is much debate about whether or not organic foods are more healthy than their pesticide-grown counterparts. In this article, we’ll explore the differences between organic and non-organic, as well as the benefits of incorporating more organic food into your diet.

Key takeaways:
Organic food is grown and processed without the use of synthetic fertilizers or hormones.
Some studies have shown that organic food has higher nutritional density than non-organic food.
Barriers such as cost and access can prevent some people from being able to buy and consume organic food.
Organic food growing practices are kinder to the environment and animals than standard agricultural farming methods.
Organic vs. non-organic
There has been an ongoing debate in the food industry as to whether organic foods are better, healthier, and more sustainable for people and the environment. The methods used to create organic food support ecological harmony and biodiversity preservation. These foods are grown without the use of industrial pesticides, artificial fertilizers, or genetically engineered organisms.

Non-organic foods, on the other hand, are produced routinely using standard agricultural methods, which involves the use of FDA approved synthetic chemicals and pesticides to promote growth and ward against pests.

In general, organic food has a greater nutritional density, due to the fact that the soil it is grown in is healthier and contains many more beneficial microbes and nutrients. There are many supporters of organic food who believe the taste is better too.

Pros and cons of organic food
While there are many benefits of organic food, there are some potential drawbacks and access issues to be mindful of.

Pros
Improved nutrient content. Some studies suggest that organic produce may have slightly higher levels of certain nutrients due to the healthier soil.
Better for the environment. Organic farming practices focus on sustainability and promote soil health and biodiversity.
Fewer chemicals. Organic foods are free from synthetic chemicals, making them less likely to contain harmful residues.
Cons
Availability. Organic food is not always available in local stores and some people may not have access to it.
Cost. Organic foods can be more expensive than non-organic options due to the higher cost of production.
Shorter shelf life. Organic produce may have a shorter shelf life because it lacks chemical preservatives.
Organic milk vs. regular milk
Dairy cows that are raised and farmed organically are fed organic feed and are often allowed to graze freely on organic pastures. They aren’t given synthetic hormones to make them produce a higher volume of milk and aren’t given routine antibiotics.

In the USA, regular milk is produced by cows who are frequently given hormones, fed food that contains pesticides, and are often kept in barns and not permitted to roam on pastureland. Other countries do not use these farming practices.

Pros and cons of organic milk
Nutritionally there is little different between the two milks. Let’s take a look into some of the benefits and drawbacks of organic vs. regular milk.

Pros
Healthier lifestyle for cows. Organic dairy farms often provide better living conditions for cows, with more access to grazing and open spaces.
No hormones or antibiotics. Organic milk is free from artificial hormones and antibiotics, which some consumers prefer to avoid.
Cons
Availability. Organic milk is not always an option for those who don't have access to a larger store or online delivery.
Cost. Organic milk can be more expensive than regular milk due to the higher cost of organic farming practices.
Non-GMO vs. organic
GMOs or genetically modified organisms have had their genetic makeup changed in an accelerated setting, such as a lab. They are a hot topic globally as some proponents of GMO food say they provide the solution to feeding a growing population, especially in countries with poor farming climates. Others argue that we don’t have a food production crisis, instead looking to the distribution and wastage issue as the core problem.

Non-GMO foods have not undergone genetic alteration, but they do not have to adhere to the same strict standards of organic food production.

Pros and cons of non-GMO food
Let’s take a look at some of the benefits and drawbacks of non-GMO food vs. organic food.

Pros
Potential health benefits. Some people believe that avoiding GMOs may be beneficial to health, although more research is needed to confirm this.
Transparency. Non-GMO labeling provides consumers with the ability to make informed choices about their food.
Cons
Potential for cross-contamination. Despite efforts to segregate crops, there is still a risk of cross-contamination between GMO and non-GMO crops.
Limited scope. Non-GMO only refers to genetic modification and doesn't address other aspects of farming, such as pesticide use.
Organic supplements
Most people who are interested in their health will have looked into supplementation at some point on their health journey. Taking extra vitamins and minerals can help build the body’s store of these vital nutrients, especially if they are lacking in food sources.

Organic supplements are dietary supplements made from organic ingredients, following the same principles as organic food production.

Types of organic supplements
There are many different types of supplements, those that contain plant nutrients can be made with either organic or non-organic ingredients. The most frequently used organic supplements include:

Organic protein powder. Made from organically sourced protein, such as whey or plant-based proteins like pea, soy, or hemp.
Organic multivitamins. Vitamins and minerals that use plant derivatives from organic sources.
Superfood powders. An addition to smoothie recipes often containing organic superfood plant sources such as spirulina, chlorella, baobab, wheatgrass, maca, acai, and barleygrass.
Pros
Environmentally friendly. Organic farming practices used in producing the supplement ingredients are eco-friendly.
Fewer synthetic additives. Organic supplements are less likely to contain artificial additives or fillers.
Cons
Limited Research. Some organic supplements may not have as much scientific research to back their claims as conventional supplements.
Cost. Organic supplements can be pricier than conventional ones due to the higher cost of organic sourcing and production.
How to eat more organic food
One drawback of the organic food industry is because it's not as widely used as standard agricultural practices, access to organic food is more limited. It's also more costly to produce and the burden of that cost falls to the consumer, which might be difficult for those working on a tight budget. However, if you are interested in incorporating more organic food into your diet, there are a few options for you to explore.

Grow your own. You can grow organic food in the smallest of places. Consider having indoor tomato and herb plants if you lack outside space. If you are lucky enough to have a garden, you could try out a small veg patch with a few easy-to-grow veggies and expand the variety as your confidence grows.
Farmers markets. Take a weekly trip to a farmers market. If there isn't one close by, consider going to one further afield with friends and take turns to drive.
Buy online. If organic fresh produce is hard to find in your area, try looking for online retailers who can deliver to your door.
Veg boxes. Many towns across the U.S have options for organic vegetable box deliveries. You'll be supporting small farms, saving money, and eating seasonally which is great for your body and the environment.
The decision between organic and non-organic meals mostly depends on your personal preferences, financial situation, and views on food production. Although non-organic foods tend to be more readily available, if you have the budget and want to support smaller farms then try out organic food where you can.

FAQ
Where does organic food come from?
Organic food comes from farms that follow organic farming practices, avoiding synthetic pesticides and fertilizers. The farms adhere to strict regulations regarding what goes into their soil, onto the plants, and fed to their animals.

Can organic food be processed?
Yes, organic food can be processed, but it must still adhere to organic standards, avoiding certain synthetic additives. Organic tofu is an example of a processed organic food.

How to find organic food near me?
To find organic food near you, check local farmers' markets, organic grocery stores, or use online directories and apps for organic food suppliers.
Dear BIOFACH Visitor, as we step into 2024, let’s pause the crystal ball gazing and rewind to the whirlwind of 2023. A turbulent year globally, with people facing myriad challenges and an air of uncertainty about what lies ahead. The EU’s political landscape witnessed a noticeable shift rightwards, seen in many election results—an echo of the desire for simple answers to complex problems.

Amidst this backdrop, organic food and farming stood tall, proving its mettle in addressing contemporary issues like climate and biodiversity crises, resource security, and conflicts. A beacon of hope, highlighted during COP28, where over 100 nations formally acknowledged the crucial link between climate and agriculture, paving the way for more sustainable agrifood systems. This, to us, is a resounding mandate for organic food and farming.

At the forefront of Europe’s climate ambitions lies the European Green Deal, a pivotal initiative. Its Farm to Fork (F2F) and Biodiversity strategies clearly recognise organic as a tool to reach the EU’s environmental goals. Setting an ambitious target of achieving 25% organic agriculture by the year 2030, these strategies serve as instrumental vehicles in propelling the agenda of transforming food and farming to aid nature restoration and foster the cultivation of resilient, nutrient-rich soils.

In the Farm to Fork context, there are many opportunities to increase both organic demand and its profile.

Policymakers can set targets for organic in sustainable public procurement (SPP). Take Denmark, for instance, where 90% of school meals already boast organic ingredients, showing many additional economic and health benefits. If you are a policymaker, I invite you to get inspired by sustainable public procurement’s many benefits.

Trade and inter-trade associations, producers groups and agrifood bodies can access the EU’s promotion policies to help sell their farm products in an increasingly competitive global marketplace. These policies offer a big budget to co-finance organic products’ promotion, opening doors to dive into a plethora of activities – public relations, advertising, point-of-sale initiatives, event participation, and social media campaigns.

As we embark on the journey of 2024, a rocky road awaits. But fear not! As the umbrella organisation for organic food and agriculture in Europe, we are your voice in the EU. To get acquainted with our organisation, I extend a warm invitation to our Policy Day at BIOFACH on 13 February. Join us to delve into policy developments and garner support for the organic market in times of crisis.

Together, let’s make 2024 the year for organic.

In recent years, largely due to the global pandemic people are becoming more cognizant that there most important asset is their health. Moreover, developing a healthier lifestyle, food safety and environmental considerations are playing greater prominence in society’s decision making process. Food safety has become a fundamental issue impacting all age groups. In addition, there has also been a greater focus on chemical free, Non-GMO and sustainable food production as a solution to many physical and mental health problems facing our global community. In such an environment, people have taken the consumption of organic food as an alternative to avoid food safety issues. As a result this has helped to fuel the rise in consumer spending on organic food.

According to Spherical Insights, the global organic food and beverages market size was valued at USD 227.45 billion in 2023 and Statista estimates in three years by 2026 this market should almost double to 437.4 %.

Every region of the world has seen an increase and interest in organic food. According to Exchange Africa, the global organic food and beverages market size was valued at US $188.35 billion in 2021 and is expected to expand at a compound annual growth rate (CAGR) of 13.0 per cent from 2022 to 2030. In Europe, The Organic Food & Beverages Market size is estimated at USD 141.29 billion in 2024, and is expected to reach USD 273.85 billion by 2029, growing at a CAGR of 14.15% during the forecast period (2024-2029). Figures by Statista highlight that by 2027, the organic dairy food and beverages industry in Latin America is estimated to reach a value of close to four billion U.S. dollars. That is an increase of nearly 71 percent in comparison to a 2022 estimate.

The evidence is clear, there an increasing consumer demand for non-GMO crops and products, driven by concerns about health, environmental sustainability, and declining population of agricultural producers. By growing non-GMO crops, farmers can tap into this growing market and meet the needs of consumers seeking healthier and more sustainable food options. The global population is growing at a rate of about 1% each year, and by 2030, the world’s population is expected to exceed 8.5 billion people

The organic share of French household food consumption is 6.1%. 12 billion euros is the value of the organic market in France in 2022, which is still 4.6% down on 2021. In the first half of 2023, the market was down 2.7% overall compared with the first half. This slowdown in the decline in the value of sales is still taking place against an inflationary backdrop that is destabilising all distribution channels.
Why do the French eat organic food?
Organic food is becoming increasingly popular in our society. Many people choose to eat organically produced food for a variety of reasons. First and foremost, to protect their health. But there are two other reasons too: the quality and taste of the products, and the need to protect the environment. But taste should not be overlooked. It remains the number one criterion for purchasing, after price and French origin.
High quality food?
In France, organic farming is one of the official signs of quality and origin. Controlled by independent certification bodies, this method of production produces products with proven health and nutritional qualities.
Back in 2003, AFSSA (the French food safety agency) concluded that organic products contained higher concentrations of certain nutrients. The results of these studies have once again shown that organic production and processing methods offer real nutritional benefits, such as: higher levels of polyphenols in fruit and vegetables, because these are produced naturally by plants to protect themselves in the event of environmental attack; a natural richness in Omega 3 in milk, because organic cows are fed mainly on grass; higher levels of polyunsaturated fatty acids in organic meat, because natural rhythms are better respected and the animals grow more slowly.
Organic farming at the service of food sovereignty!
Figures from Agence bio show that the consumption of organic products makes a major contribution to food sovereignty: 83% of the organic food consumed in France (excluding “exotic” products) is produced in France. 30.2% of imported organic products such as coffee, chocolate, spices, rice, teas, etc. are produced in France. On the export side, sales are set to remain steady at €1.05 billion in 2022, with wine (54%) and groceries accounting for the bulk.
Jobs in the regions!
In 2017, it is estimated that there were almost 134,500 jobs directly involved in organic farming (jobs on organic farms and those linked to processing and distribution activities), 16,500 more than in 2016. A total of 49,200 direct jobs have been created since 2012, with average annual growth of +9.5% over the last 5 years.
While employment in agriculture fell at an average annual rate of -1.1% between 2010 and 2015, employment in organic farming increased by 10,669 full-time jobs between 2017 and 2016, representing an increase of an impressive 13.7% (Source Bilan annuel de l’emploi agricole (BAEA), Agreste Chiffres et Données Agriculture no. 238, July 2017).
These job opportunities contribute to the dynamism of France’s regions. In addition to the benefits for the environment and animal welfare, the organic sector adds significant value to local economic and social life. When consumers buy an organic product, they are supporting employment in France in their own way.
Organic farming in education: what role can it play in teaching and training?
Since 2008, the teaching of organic farming has been compulsory. It has become mandatory to cover the “Organic Farming” production method in all agricultural education courses (service note DGER/SDPOFE/N2008-2081- Minister for Agriculture and Fisheries).
Developed by the Ministry of Agriculture and Food, the national “Formabio” network supports schools in teaching organic farming practices. Every year, it organises meetings and events across France to help schools. The aim is to raise awareness of organic farming among pupils, trainees, apprentices and students in agricultural education. The programme also seeks to develop organic farming on the farms of agricultural colleges across the country.
According to the Direction Générale de l’Enseignement et de la Recherche, in 2019 there were 123 farms with at least one organic farming workshop, 26 fully organic farms and 4,235 hectares farmed under organic conditions.
For the youngest students, Agence Bio offers educational kits for children and teachers in classes from CM1 to 6ème to discover organic farming as part of the Science & Technology and Geography syllabuses.
Organic farming is based on sustainable agricultural management that preserves the soil and natural ecosystems. It uses cultivation and breeding practices that respect natural balances and have an impact on the environment. French society has largely embraced these concepts, but purchasing power and inflation are limiting and slowing this momentum.
Europeans are increasingly keen to eat food that is both healthy for them and gentle on the environment. Retail sales of organic food in the EU jumped 80% between 2015 and 2020.
But accelerating the switch away from industrialised farming in Europe requires more than just an evolution in consumer demand. Actors throughout the agri-food system ranging from farmers and packagers to retailers and restaurants must be involved in the transition.
The EU aims for a quarter of its agricultural land to be under organic farming by 2030, up from almost 10% in 2021.
Organic farming not only is free of pesticides, fertilisers and anti-microbials but also embraces animal welfare, the protection of biodiversity, more localised supply and the reuse of materials.

As a key to a more sustainable agri-food system, organic farming supports the aims of the European Green Deal, the EU’s Farm to Fork strategy and the EU’s biodiversity strategy for 2030. 
Organic farming respects natural ecosystems and protects soils as well as plant, animal and human health.
Although organic farms in Europe have lower yields on average, they generate similar or greater income per worker as a result of higher prices and EU support levels as well as some lower input costs. 
Rules help foster change, particularly by bolstering consumer confidence. The principles of organic farming in Europe are set out in European legislation and are backed up by controls on farmers, processors and traders as well as by an EU-wide labelling system. 
Research too has a key role to play because organic farming is knowledge-intensive rather than input-intensive.
The EU is allocating €9 billion to research and innovation in the area of food, the bioeconomy, natural resources, agriculture and the environment between 2021 and 2027.
This work is developing and sharing ecological best practices for farming in a bid to spur root-and-branch changes in Europe’s agri-food system.
Horizon Magazine talked with Jan Plagge, president of the European umbrella group for organic food and farming – IFOAM Organics Europe – about the EU’s contribution in this area. Plagge, who is also president of German organic food association Bioland, has been involved in the development of the sector in Europe for the past 30 years. 

25 years of organic figures from around the world
In 2000, the yearbook “The World of Organic Agriculture” was published for the first time. The figures from this joint publication have been presented at the presented at the leading BIOFACH trade fair. Helga Willer reports on how it all began and how the data collection has developed since then.
When the initiators of the BIOFACH trade fair asked the Stiftung Ökologie & Landbau (SÖL) in 1999 whether it would be interested in presenting the most important statistics on organic farming every year at BIOFACH, we could not have imagined that we would still be presenting the latest figures regularly in Nuremberg years later – for the 25th time in 2024!

Since data collection began, the global organic area has increased by over 400 percent and the organic market by over 700 percent (2000-2021). Worldwide, almost 77 million hectares or 1.6 percent of agricultural land was organic in 2021; global retail sales of organic food reached almost 125 billion euros (see figure). Support for number crunching has also grown. In the early days, the activities were carried out by SÖL and supported by Biofach. Today, the Research Institute of Organic Agriculture (FiBL Switzerland) collects the data. It is supported by the Swiss State Secretariat for Economic Affairs (SECO), the Swiss Coop Fund for Sustainability, IFOAM – Organics International and NürnbergMesse as the organizer of Biofach. The collection is also made possible by numerous partners from all over the world, some of whom have been supplying their data for 25 years.
The data collection has been continuously expanded since 1999 and is now the most important reference work on the development of organic farming
The data collection has been continuously expanded since 1999 and is now the most important reference work on the development of organic farming. The EU Commission, for example, uses the figures to show that European consumers place a high value on organic products. Scientists regularly cite the data in their work. In 2015, the survey on the status of voluntary sustainability standards such as Fairtrade or Rainforest Alliance, which are published annually on vss.fibl.org, was added to the organic farming data.
Most of the data is collected through personal contacts, but a lot of data can also be obtained via the Internet. For example, Eurostat, the statistical office of the EU, offers data on areas, livestock, production and farms on its website. Those countries that do not make their data publicly available receive a FiBL questionnaire. If there is no national body that collects data, FiBL collects the data from international certifiers and compiles it itself for the country in question.
A collection of over 200 data sources
The area and production data often come from different sources than the market, export and import data. For example, in the US, data on organic acreage, production and livestock comes from the US Department of Agriculture’s Bureau of Statistics, while retail trade data is provided by the Organic Trade Association (OTA). Import and export data, on the other hand, come from the Foreign Agricultural Service of the Department of Agriculture. In total, FiBL works with at least 200 different data sources and suppliers.
The most important medium for disseminating the data is the yearbook “The World of Organic Agriculture”
In addition to the demanding quality assurance, it is also labor-intensive to manage the constantly increasing volume of data. Improved access to data via digital tools is a further challenge. FiBL provides interactive databases and infographics on its website statistics. fibl.org, which requires constant further development. We are therefore working on adding further indicators, improving user-friendliness and being able to estimate production data automatically.
The most important medium for disseminating the data is the yearbook “The World of Organic Agriculture”, which FiBL publishes together with IFOAM – Organics International and presents annually at the BIOFACH trade fair. In addition to detailed tables and graphs, this work also contains reports on the development of organic farming on the continents and on topics such as the market and legislation. Accompanying the book, the data can be accessed interactively online. The offer is rounded off by infographics that are very popular with users and, like the other materials, can be accessed via organic-world.net.
Organic farming in the land of agrochemicals
Costa Rica leads the world in pesticide use while a small group of farmers strive to produce chemical-free food to the nation
“Hi, I’m Tigre. At your service,” Rodolfo Zamora introduces himself. He’s had that nickname since he was young and takes pride in it. You can see his love of tigers in the paintings, drawings, stuffed animals and other objects found around his farm in Oreamuno, a mountainous area in the province of Cartago, Costa Rica. Zamora and his wife, Hannia, show us around the Rinconcito Orgánico Irazú farm and share the story of how it all came about. The farm sits on a tidy 1.7 acres where they have been growing nearly 70 different crops since 2006. That was the year Tigre decided to leave his bank job and become a farmer.
Tigre and Hannia may seem like just another couple of farmers in an agricultural area, but they actually represent a minority. Tigre points at his neighbor’s land: “It looks healthy and green, but it actually lacks nutrients.” The soil is visibly affected by land erosion. The property line between the two farms marks the boundary between two worlds: organic farming and conventional farming with agrochemicals, which accounts for 98% of the country’s agriculture.
According to the State of the Nation Program, a report prepared annually by Costa Rica’s public universities, organic agriculture makes up 1.9% of the country’s farmed area. To be recognized as organic producers requires certification from the Ministry of Agriculture and Livestock (MAG). Organic farms aim to maximize natural resources through circular agriculture methods: separate sections of a farm are intentionally linked together so that each area helps the other.
Despite its long-standing promotion and commitment to ecological practices, Costa Rica has the highest per-acre pesticide use in the world. According to the U.N. Food and Agriculture Organization (FAO), Costa Rica used an average of 51.5 pounds (23.4 kilos) of pesticide per 2.47 acres (1 hectare).
There is strong evidence of the health risks posed by these products, leading to strict regulations in the European Union. However, Costa Rica still lacks such regulations. Not far from where Tigre and Hannia live, two towns in Cartago province with approximately 10,000 people lost their drinking water in 2023 due to contamination from chlorothalonil pesticide. It’s a carcinogenic substance banned in the European Union, although it’s still produced in Germany. Costa Rica finally banned chlorothalonil last November after years of pressure by environmentalists.
Harmony with the soil
Tigre shows off the strawberries thriving in his greenhouse. The difference between his organic strawberries and chemically-treated ones is immediately noticeable. “The flavor is so delicious and tender – it’s something else altogether.” Tigre and Hannia’s farm is an exemplary model. They have won national and international awards, host visits from prestigious universities in Europe and the United States, and offer courses on organic farming. “People are amazed to see our little project stuck in the middle of all these conventional farms,” said Hannia.
Tigre and Hannia stress that organic goes beyond simply avoiding chemicals. In the classroom they’ve set up on the farm, the couple offers lectures on their process. This includes minimal tillage, no heavy machinery, homemade fertilizer, rainwater harvesting, crop grouping, and even techniques for optimal plant growth. “Everything converges in a natural and harmonious way,” said Tigre.
Diversifying crops is crucial for soil health. Monoculture leads to soil degradation, while variety enriches it. Crop rotation also disrupts pest reproduction and drives them away. On conventional farms that grow the same crops every season, pests tend to multiply, requiring chemical treatments. Organic farming mimics nature, where everything grows in harmony.
The couple is frustrated because they haven’t been able to replicate organic production in the area. They want to convince other farmers that conventional farming is more vulnerable to climate change and unstable prices. However, this doesn’t mean that Tigre and Hannia’s organic farm is safe from these external factors. The long drought in Costa Rica has depleted their water reserves more than usual for this time of year.
Organic farming also stands out for its recognition of the harmful effects of pesticides on both consumers and farmworkers. Cristian Rivera was once a day laborer on a conventional farm and experienced the harmful effects of chemical exposure on his health. “I couldn’t run without getting out of breath,” he said.Rivera now works at Rinconcito Orgánico, free from agrochemical exposure, and has regained his health.
A small and exclusive market
“Excuse me, do you know where Bryan’s stand is?”
“The one with Papaya? It’s over there,” said a woman, pointing to a produce stand with three dogs running around.
Papaya is not a fruit – it’s the name of one of Bryan Didier’s dogs. Didier has a stand at the Green Farmers’ Market, where only certified organic producers can sell their goods in downtown San José. Bryan’s dog is named after one of his star products. He entices buyers by offering them a taste of fresh papaya. “It really tastes different,” said Didier, who has a farm in La Fortuna, about three hours drive from San José. Since 2006, he has worked on the farm with his father, cultivating around 70 different crops.
La Fortuna is an area with a mix of tourism and large-scale monoculture. Bryan’s farm is surrounded by big companies that use pesticides. To protect his land from contamination, he created a “living barrier” using green poppies. The strategy has been successful. Unlike the barren monoculture plantations, Bryan’s farm is teeming with wildlife that has naturally made its way to the area. Bryan takes pride in the sight of four sloths living in his trees. He has two helpers at the stand, where he shows an older woman the right way to eat lemon peel. He tells another customer in English about all the products available today.
You can hear a lot of English spoken at the Green Farmers’ Market, and not just by Bryan, who is half American. The market is geared to a small and exclusive slice of San José: Americans, Europeans and wealthy Costa Ricans. The farmers at this market know that they cater to customers willing to pay higher prices for organic products because of the harm caused by conventional agriculture.

Organic farmers are unable to match the low prices offered by conventional farmers because of the $1,000 annual certification fee and cumbersome bureaucratic paperwork. The MAG can conduct surprise inspections and revoke certifications if all requirements are not met. “The government is crushing us. I wouldn’t do it again, knowing what I know now,” said Didier.
There are other problems, such as what Moisés Gómez calls “unfair competition” in the organic sector. This includes producers falsely claiming organic certification or mixing products from organic and conventional farms.
Gómez is well acquainted with this world as his entire family is involved in organic agriculture in Dota, a canton located south of San José. Alongside his parents and three brothers, they cultivate a variety of products that they sell at the Green Farmers’ Market. They begin stocking their stand before daybreak; it’s the first one you see when entering the market. Unlike Bryan, Hannia, and Tigre, who are surrounded by conventional farms, the Gómez farm is in one of the most organically productive areas of the country. He says that many of his neighbors also grow organic crops, so there is less concern about chemical contamination. But he agrees with the others that organic producers are penalized by the government instead of promoted.
Denmark is known for being the country with the highest percentage of organic agriculture, accounting for 90% of its crops. The Danish government provides subsidies and encourages organic producers, while Costa Rica heavily relies on agrochemicals. “People like things fast and easy, but they need to understand that the cheapest medicine is food,” said Gómez. “They need to understand that it’s worth the effort.”
Cooperation Minister Amit Shah on Wednesday launched the ‘Bharat Organics’ brand of the newly created National Cooperative Organics Ltd (NCOL), batting for organic agriculture and flagging the cancer risk in the overuse of chemicals fertilisers.
Addressing the national symposium on promotion of organic products through cooperatives, Shah said: “I used to travel to many states when I was involved in (the BJP’s) organisation activities. Many trains which used to go towards the cities were called ‘cancer’ trains. This was important enough to open our eyes.”
“The overuse of fertilisers and pesticides in some states and consumption of foodgrain produced in this manner has led to cancer in people. This is the most devastating loss. Apart from this, it has led to diabetes, blood pressure, brain stroke,” he said, acknowledging the link between overuse of fertilizers and pesticides, and cancer.
Calling for change, Amit Shah said: “The Prime Minister has called upon the farmers to move in the direction of organic farming.”
Amid concerns that organic farming may not aid productivity, Shah said: “There have been models of farming that have broken the myth that organic farming leads to fall in production. Our Gujarat Rajyapal, Acharya ji, has successfully experimented with this in many farms across Haryana, which has not only resulted in increasing fertility of land but also increase in production as he has shown. He has attempted to cultivate 21 acres with just one cow.”
Indicating that there is a swell in the number of farmers who are turning organic, the Cooperatives Minister, said: “I am happy to share that in the past five to six years, lakhs of farmers in this country have adopted this, accepted this. After enduring two to three years of a painful process, today many farmers have registered their land as organic.”
He went on to identify issues that plague the market. “No one is willing to agree that the product is organic as there is no certification. For the consumers also, there is an issue. As organic products fetch better prices, many fake products flood the market.”
The solution to the problem, he said, lies in the National Organic Cooperatives Limited which was approved by the Union cabinet on January 11, 2023. “This has been established to give a platform to all those farmers in the country who produce organic products and to enable them to market their products.”
“Funds for the same were made available on January 25, 2023, and on March 21, 2023, the law also came into force. However, today, when I am launching six products of Bharat Organic Ltd, perhaps no one is happier than I am because I know what is going to happen,” said Shah, indicating the official launch of the ambitious scheme to turn more than 50% of farming in India organic or natural.
The six organic products — tur dal, chana dal, sugar, rajma, basmati rice, and Sonamasoori rice — will be sold through Mother Dairy’s Safal outlets and online platforms, he said and added a network of retail outlets is being created across the country.
Expressing confidence that Bharat Organics would go on to be a super performer like other successful cooperative brands like IFFCO or Amul, Shah said: “Today, I would like to tell all those who are associated with cooperatives and agriculture that Bharat Organics is on its way to becoming the biggest brand not just in the country but in the entire world. I am confident of this as I know the strength of our cooperatives and also that of our farmers. This is our track record and this has been achieved by our farmers. By December 2023, we will launch 20 products”.
Apart from launching six organic food products, Shah also launch organic fertiliser, an initiative taken by Prime Minister Modi in his constituency Varanasi. NDDB and Gujarat State Fertilizer & Chemicals Limited have registered a brand for high quality cowdung and will also set up a cowdung gas plant with a 4,000 cubic meter capacity in Varanasi.
“We have to look at cowdung though the commercial lens. Not even one gram of gobar in the country should be wasted, when it can be used in improving soil fertility of the land, organic farming and enhancing the propensity of farmers.”

In current scenario, some people by using harmful pesticides and fertilizers are putting their life at risk. In India, the growing population is a significant issue. The growing population means there is a growing need for food. To meet the demands for food production, hybrids, hazardous pesticides and chemical fertilizers are highly used from which the environment and human health are being negatively impacted.Now among the farmers the awareness about organic farming in India is increasing. About 2.78 million hectares of land in India are used for organic farming. India is a major producer of organic products including oilseeds, cereals, coffee, teaand dried fruits. India produces a large amount of these goods and exports them. The three main Indian states that cultivate organic products are Sikkim, Uttarakhand, and Tripura. Madhya Pradesh, Rajasthan, and Maharashtra are additional states that practise organic farming.
Food quality and safety are primary concerns of Indian consumers today and the practice of farming in an organic manner is not new. In India, the goal of organic farming is to cultivate crops while preserving the fertility of the soil.Utilising aquatic waste, waste crops, animal and farm waste, organic waste and other organic materials in a healthy manner. Organic farming is one of the several approaches found to meet the objectives of sustainable agriculture. Numerous organic farming methods such as intercropping, mulching and integrating crops and livestock, are not unique to any one agricultural system encompassing the customary farming methods used in historical nations like Asia.However, the use of practically all synthetic inputs is prohibited by a number of laws and certification programmes that support organic farming, and the method’s primary focus is acknowledged to be soil health. The negative impacts of contemporary farming methods have been extensively documented worldwide, not only on the farm but also on the environment and the health of all living things. People have been encouraged to think aloud by the application of technology, especially in relation to the widespread use of chemical pesticides and fertilizers. Soil erosion, salinization, water scarcity, soil contamination, genetic erosion and other environmental problems are examples of how they harm the ecosystem. In light of this, businesses are giving organic farming priority since it’s one of the best ways to reduce the usage of dangerous chemicals while simultaneously ensuring food security and enhancing farmers’ livelihood. The health of the agro ecosystem, including biodiversity, biological cycles and soil biological activity is promoted and enhanced by an organic agricultural system. It increases crop yields, promotes soil and water conservation and lowers greenhouse gas emissions. The environment and wildlife benefit greatly from organic production because it limits the use of synthetic pesticides and fertilisers, manages noncropped habitats empathetically, and uses a mixed farming system.These benefits include preserving biodiversity, enhancing soil quality, luring beneficial insects with weed species, promoting pollination, and creating habitats for small mammals and birds. Apart from birds and small mammals, organic farms have approximately 30% higher species diversity such as spiders, earthworms, beetles, butterflies and soil microbes than conventional farms.As a result, conventional farming has been gradually replaced by organic and sustainable farming practises in the industry. The overall improvement of social welfare, environment and the general economy are all greatly benefited by organic farming.
The majority of financial exploitation by middlemen and big businesses falls on farmers. Farmers frequently cannot get fair prices for their produce because of improper implementation of the government’s minimum support price (MSP) system. They are consequently compelled to accept expensive loans from moneylenders. Debt is a vicious cycle that results in protests, poverty and farmer suicide.
Because of the growing demand for organic products worldwide, organic farming enables farmers to get higher prices for their produce. In India, there are many certified organic farmers who engage in organic farming and multiple number of farmers are practicing organic methods with the efforts of government and they can also get certification for their organic products. For example, PGS (Participatory Guarantee System) certified cluster-based organic farming is encouraged by the ParamparagatKrishiVikasYojna (PKVY). Over the course of three years, the scheme provides INR 50,000 per hectare, of which 62% is allocated as an incentive for using organic inputs.
Organic farming have a positive impact on environment as it is a collection of farming techniques designed to protect and improve soil biodiversity and ecosystem welfare. It is accomplished by employing a variety of species, implementing crop rotations, and applying natural pest control methods. In organic farming, the use of chemical fertilizers and pesticides is forbidden. It has a beneficial effect on climate change and aids in the reduction of greenhouse gas emissions.
Globally, organic farming is thought to increase biodiversity by about 34% and abundance by about 50%. Environmental conservation is benefitted from the protective role played by the organic farming. It depends on biodiversity, ecological processes and cycles that are adjusted to the local environment rather than artificial inputs. Three primary goals are frequently integrated by this system: social and economic equity, environmental health and economic profitability.
Due to the worldwide occurrence of COVID-19 pandemic consumers are now more concerned about their health and what food they are consuming. People want to know where and how their food is being grown. Food allergies, hormonal imbalances, PCOS, falling immunisations, dangerous diseases like cancer, and much more can be linked to chemical and pesticide residues in modern production, which can be mitigated by eating organic food. Since organic food doesn’t contain any dangerous chemicals or pesticides, it’s frequently thought to be healthier. Demand for and sales of organic products have surged due to the growing popularity of healthy eating practices, such as eating more fruits and vegetables, whole grains, and plant-based proteins.
Variations in cultural season/weather, crop fertilizer/pesticide treatments, soil composition, and transportation/storage conditions all have an influence on the chemical composition of organic foods, which causes a difference in nutrient values between organic and conventional food products. As organic foods become more and more popular, people prefer to purchase these food products as a healthier option. However, it is still too early to draw a final conclusion, as scientists have found no consistent results in field research.
The market for organic food is expanding due to consumer changes in lifestyle, increased income levels, and growing health consciousness. Organic farming has the potential to make a major economic contribution to India. The industry has a positive effect on GDP growth, job creation, and export revenue. It encourages sustainable development as well. Of all industries, agriculture accounts for 14% of GDP and employs 42% of workers. The nation can make a major GDP growth contribution and potentially lead the world in organic agriculture. Apparently, the recent market expansion of organic food products has been fueled by research as well as consumer demand.
Farmers are not the only one who gain profit financially from organic farming. Increased demand and output from input suppliers to retailers benefit the entire value chain. In India, organic farming’s future lies in expanding its cultivated area, fostering farmer-to-consumer relationships and establishing supportive policy frameworks. The private sector has also encouraged organic farming in India, even though the government has taken some steps in this direction. While some businesses have established their own organic farms, others have given farmers financial support to switch to organic practises. In terms of organic agriculture, India could lead the world if the proper policies are put in place.
Revolutionizing India’s organic food landscape with tech
According to the 2022 survey conducted in 187 countries practicing organic agriculture by the international resource data from the Research Institute of Organic Agriculture (FiBL) and International Federation of Organic Agriculture Movements (IFOAM), organic food in India is cultivated in 2.6 Mn hectares, fifth largest in the world.
In recent times, the organic food sector has undergone a remarkable metamorphosis, propelled by the amalgamation of technology and traditional farming practices. As health-conscious consumers in India and globally, increasingly gravitate towards sustainable choices, technology is taking center stage in reshaping the organic food sector.
India’s organic food market has witnessed exponential growth after the pandemic. According to the 2022 survey conducted in 187 countries practicing organic agriculture by the international resource data from the Research Institute of Organic Agriculture (FiBL) and International Federation of Organic Agriculture Movements (IFOAM), organic food in India is cultivated in 2.6 Mn hectares, fifth largest in the world. The report further revealed that the share of land used for organic farming in total agriculture land is 1.5%, and in the last ten years, India increased its organic agriculture land under cultivation by 145.1%. The Economic Survey 2022-2023 mentions that India has 4.43 Mn organic farmers, the highest in the world. 
Evolving food preferences, influenced by rising per capita income in developing nations, occupational shifts, and global interconnections, pose challenges amid a growing population. Conventional agricultural techniques from the 20th century, while enhancing productivity, encounter limitations and environmental threats. Dependency on chemical fertilisers and pesticides hampers global food production. This is where technology is stepping in. 
Technological advancements in the agriculture sector are ensuring advancements to ensure food security in the face of changing demographics and environmental concerns. Here’s how – 
Precision Agriculture: The advent of precision agriculture, powered by technology, is heralding a new era for organic farming in India. As per World Economic Forum The global food security challenge is straightforward: by 2050, the world must feed two billion more people, an increase of a quarter from today’s global population. The demand for food will be 56% greater than it was in 2010. In addition to this, globally, the sector accounts for 30% of greenhouse gas emissions and 70% of freshwater withdrawals so attention has to be paid to energy and water use in farming. Therefore, safeguarding food security while minimising environmental impact is a must which can be achieved with precision farming. Farmers are swiftly embracing sensor technologies, drones, and data analytics to monitor and manage their crops effectively. Sensor-based technologies, for instance, provide real-time data on soil health, moisture levels, and nutrient content. This data-driven approach facilitates precise irrigation and targeted application of organic fertilisers, curbing waste and optimising resource utilisation.
Blockchain Technology:
The perennial challenge of ensuring the authenticity of organic products finds a formidable solution in blockchain technology. According to a Deloitte study, the implementation of blockchain in the supply chain can slash food fraud, instilling greater confidence in the organic label among consumers.
Blockchain creates an immutable and transparent ledger for every transaction in the supply chain, establishing the verifiability of organic claims. This not only fosters consumer trust but also empowers organic farmers to secure fair prices for their products.
E-Commerce and Direct-to-Consumer Models:
The rapidly growing e-commerce platforms have injected fresh vigor into the organic food market in India. The amalgamation of online shopping convenience with the escalating demand for organic products is reshaping how consumers access their groceries.
Direct-to-consumer models, facilitated by technology, empower organic farmers to reach a wider audience without intermediaries. This not only ensures a fair share of profits for farmers but also provides consumers with convenient access to a diverse array of organic products.
Data-Driven Decision Making
The utilisation of data analytics is arming organic farmers with the tools for informed decision-making and improved crop management. By harnessing data on weather patterns, market trends, and historical crop performance, organic farmers can optimize planting schedules, minimise waste, and respond proactively to changing conditions. This data-driven approach not only enhances productivity but also contributes significantly to the overall sustainability of organic farming practices.
Delving into the specific context of India, several unique facets highlight the symbiosis of technology and organic farming in India:
1. AgriTech Startups: The proliferation of AgriTech startups is providing Indian organic farmers with digital tools to enhance crop monitoring, supply chain optimization, and market access.
2. Mobile Technology for Farmer Outreach: In a country where a substantial population is engaged in agriculture, mobile technology is disseminating real-time weather updates, market prices, and best organic farming practices directly to farmers, bolstering their knowledge base.
3. Organic Certification Platforms: Platforms like Jaivik Bharat are streamlining the organic certification process in India, reducing bureaucratic hurdles, and ensuring the credibility of organic products.
4. Solar-Powered Solutions: In addressing power supply challenges in remote areas, India is integrating solar-powered solutions such as pumps and cold storage, aligning with the sustainable ethos of organic farming.
5. Community-Supported Agriculture (CSA) Platforms: The rising popularity of CSA platforms connects Indian consumers directly with local organic farmers, facilitated by technology, fostering a robust farmer-consumer relationship.
6. Artificial Intelligence in Pest Management: Given the significance of pest management, AI-based solutions in India are emerging to predict and manage pest outbreaks, reducing crop losses and promoting sustainable pest control practices.
As India’s organic food sector undergoes this tech-driven metamorphosis, it is evident that technology is not just a tool but a catalyst for positive change. The unique dynamics of India’s agricultural landscape, coupled with the transformative power of technology, pave the way for a more sustainable and resilient future for the organic food industry in the country.


Over the past few decades, organic farming has gained increasing attention because of its perceived positive impact on the future of sustainable food production and its endeavours to address the environmental concerns associated with conventional agriculture.
ENHANCEMENTS in living standards and the resultant shifts in consumption patterns are driving a growing worldwide appetite for food. Consequently, the urgency to establish a truly sustainable food production system intensifies each year. 
The constraints on available arable land, primarily stemming from soil depletion, expanding urbanization, and the impacts of climate change, endanger the efficiency of traditional agricultural methods. Consequently, farming systems that rely less on external resources hold the potential to enhance sustainability. 
A prominent and widely embraced low-input approach is organic farming, characterized by its reliance on ecologically sound agricultural practices.
Over the past few decades, organic farming has gained increasing attention because of its perceived positive impact on the future of sustainable food production and its endeavours to address the environmental concerns associated with conventional agriculture. Organic farming represents a food production model entirely devoid of chemical inputs and synthetic fertilizers.
It relies on natural techniques like crop rotation and other ecological methods to sustain soil fertility and manage pests. The core principles of organic farming involve cultivating crops and raising livestock without resorting to synthetic pesticides and fertilizers. Its rising popularity in recent years is attributed to its potential advantages for both human well-being and environmental conservation. Organic products are devoid of detrimental chemicals and artificial pesticides. 
Organic farming represents a vital agro ecological method essential for providing sufficient sustenance for the expanding global population. This method reduces the reliance on external resources, such as chemical fertilizers and pesticides, to yield safe and non-toxic crops. Consequently, it has a lower ecological footprint and offers significant potential for enhanced food production.
Agriculture in Malaysia is marked by extensive use of fertilizers and manure, resulting in environmental contamination. In recent years, organic farming has been gaining traction in Malaysia, actively endorsed by the government as a means to counter unsustainable agricultural practices. 
The promotion of organic farming in Malaysia serves as a strategy to bolster the income of small-scale producers, preserve the environment, and diminish the country’s reliance on food imports. In 2022, the import value of food into Malaysia stood at approximately RM75.71 billion, according to Statista.
In the developing world, approximately 1 billion people are grappling with food shortages and environmental deterioration due to unsustainable agricultural practices. 
There is potential for increased yields in these countries by transitioning to organic farming. Over the long term, organic farming proves to be a more profitable option compared to conventional methods. 
Recently, the Malaysian community has been growing more conscious of the advantages of organic food and its potential benefits for human health. 
The adoption of organic food could also play a role in achieving more sustainable food production and positively impacting national food security, as outlined in Goal 2. According to the Department of Statistics Malaysia (2022), the country achieved a self-sufficiency rate of 65.0 percent in rice production in 2021, falling short of the 75.0 percent target set in the 12th Malaysia Plan (2021-2025).
In addition to its positive effects on the environment, organic farming has indirectly fostered job creation, income generation, the advancement of new technologies and local knowledge, and the establishment of networks, all of which contribute to supporting rural development. The consumption of organic food in Malaysia is currently on the rise, primarily driven by a growing awareness of health concerns and the expansion of organic agriculture. 
The decision to purchase organic food, including rice, is significantly shaped by consumers’ perceptions of its environmental and health attributes, aligning with Goal 3. Many organic consumers consider organic food to be healthier, more flavourful, and more environmentally friendly than conventional options. Nonetheless, the quality of organic foods does not significantly impact consumers’ purchasing decisions. Food quality is typically associated with factors like freshness, food safety, nutritional value, and cost-effectiveness, with freshness emerging as the top consumer preference when buying vegetables and meat in Malaysia.
Organic farming offers a range of advantages; first, organic farming is capable of yielding exceptionally nutritious and healthful food. Organic food boasts numerous health benefits, providing more nutrients compared to conventionally cultivated products.
Second, organic farming has significant potential to lower greenhouse gas emissions. It uses fewer fossil fuels per unit of land and per unit of crop yield because it doesn’t rely on synthetic fertilizers. 
Instead, organic farming emphasizes the improvement of soil fertility and nitrogen provision through techniques like cultivating leguminous plants, using crop residues, and employing protection crops.
Third, enhanced soil fertility leads to the preservation of soil organic matter and frequently results in the sequestration of CO2 in the soil. Consequently, this enhances the soil’s capacity to hold onto moisture, which, in turn, bolsters the resilience of organic farming when faced with unpredictable climate conditions characterized by higher temperatures and irregular rainfall patterns. 
Organic farming practices that prioritize the retention of soil carbon are better equipped to withstand climatic challenges, particularly in regions highly susceptible to the impacts of advancing climate change, as outlined in Goal 13. Furthermore, organic farming effectively mitigates soil erosion, a significant source of CO2 emissions, thereby reducing its environmental impact.
Fourth, Organic farming can make a significant contribution to agroforestry production systems. Organic approaches demonstrate exceptional flexibility in response to climate change, mainly because they rely on traditional methods and the wisdom of farmers, soil-enriching practices, and a significant focus on diversity. 
Moreover, numerous environmental changes manifest gradually over an extended period. Organic agriculture considers the enduring impact of agricultural practices on the agroecosystem, with a focus on achieving a harmonious ecological equilibrium to preclude issues related to soil fertility and pests. Instead of reacting to problems as they arise, organic agriculture adopts a proactive approach.
Fifth, the contamination of groundwater streams resulting from the application of synthetic fertilizers and pesticides represents a significant issue. In organic agriculture, the use of these substances is forbidden, and instead, they are substituted with organic fertilizers. 
Additionally, the promotion of greater biodiversity enhances soil structure and water permeation. Organically managed systems that effectively retain nutrients significantly diminish the likelihood of groundwater pollution. In regions where pollution poses a substantial concern, transitioning to organic farming is strongly recommended as a remedial action.
Sixth, organic farming reduces the consumption of non-renewable energy by reducing the use of agrochemicals. Furthermore, it aids in countering the greenhouse effect and global warming by its capacity to capture and store carbon in the soil.
Seventh, organic farmers act as stewards of biodiversity at different levels, benefiting from and preserving it. On the genetic front, they give preference to conventional and adjusted seeds and breeds because of their heightened resilience against diseases and their capacity to endure climate-related difficulties. 

On the level of different species, the integration of various combinations of plants and animals amplifies the cycling of nutrients and energy, ultimately boosting agricultural productivity. 
At the ecosystem scale, preserving natural areas both within and surrounding organic fields, along with the lack of chemical inputs, fosters favourable environments for nature. 
Regularly using fewer common species helps to safeguard agrobiodiversity and, as a result, strengthens the genetic resources essential for future adaptation. The establishment of habitats that provide food and shelter, coupled with the avoidance of pesticide use, attracts previously absent or returning species to organic settings. 
This includes wild plants and animals, as well as organisms that contribute positively to the organic ecosystem, such as pollinators and natural pest controllers.
Finally, it is important to highlight that while organic farming comes with its own set of difficulties, which may include the possibility of reduced yields, increased labour demands, and occasionally higher prices for consumers, it remains a viable and eco-conscious approach to food production. Its advantages for both human well-being and the environment are numerous. As awareness of the benefits of organic food continues to spread, the demand for organic products is on the rise. 
This growing demand is propelling the expansion of the organic farming sector and is gradually making organic food more affordable and attainable for a wider audience.

After completing his studies from Delhi University, Ajeet Godara decided to go back to his village in Sri Ganganagar, Rajasthan, as he wanted to create a difference in the field of farming.  Coming from an agricultural family, Ajeet decided to join his father and brother Arvind, who had abandoned his studies to join farming. But Ajeet and his brother’s decision to get into farming was not welcomed by the local farming community. They were disheartened to see the brothers, who had invested significantly in their education, pursue farming, which the community was already disillusioned with. However, Ajeet and Arvind were not discouraged. They teamed up and came up with a plan to start an organic farming business. This led to the birth of ﻿Natureland organics﻿ in 2002.  Get connected to Natureland organics The brand has over 180 SKUs, including pulses, millets, wheat, mustard, barely, rice, gram, oils, etc. From B2B, the brand entered the D2C segment in 2016, and is now eyeing clocking an annual revenue of around Rs 150 crore, closed FY23 with Rs 135 crore. Farm to fork Ajeet says that transforming an agricultural land into an organic farming haven took them around three years.  “In those tough times, we faced difficulties and didn’t have money. Not just our family, but people around us would discourage us because we were going through a hard time. They said our efforts wouldn’t succeed and that we were wasting our time,” he recalls. Get connected to Natureland organics But Ajeet and his brother’s persistence slowly began to yield results, and by 2005, with an investment of around Rs 25 lakh, they established a thriving business engaged in the business-to-business (B2B) trade of wheat and chana.  “We explained our concept to farmers in other geographies, and even though it wasn’t a cakewalk, many agreed to convert their land into organic farms. Like this, we covered a wide region and this marked the inception of Natureland Organics,” says Ajeet. As of now, Natureland Organics has over 35,000 acres of dedicated farmlands across India, spread across nine states including Rajasthan, Uttarakhand, Himachal Pradesh, Madhya Pradesh, Chhattisgarh, Maharashtra, Andhra Pradesh, Telangana, and Karnataka.  Natureland also provides farmers with specialised training programmes to enhance their crop management skills and boost yields. “Our goal is to safeguard our farmers from any potential contaminants in their food supply,” says Ajeet, speaking about the challenges in organic farming compared to conventional farming. A journey from B2B to D2C After setting foot into the business, from 2002 to 2015, Natureland Organics was operating solely as a B2B supplier to other organic food brands. But the next phase of growth happened when it marked its entry into the D2C space in 2016.  Speaking about what made the brand foray into D2C, Ajeet says, “We started our journey as a B2B company from a small farmland. However, over the years, we felt the dire need to expand the reach of organic food products at a fair price point to mass consumers and not just premium ones. Hence, we forayed into the D2C segment.”  Recognising changing consumer behaviour and preferences, the brothers explored all mediums like offline stores and ecommerce portals to reach consumers. But by entering the D2C space, Natureland Organics has been able to establish a closer connection with its customers, says Ajeet.   “Our D2C brand is now contributing to 40% of our revenue, and the numbers are growing,” he adds. Natureland Organics, which competes with the likes of 24 Mantra Organic, Organic Harvest, and others, is today available to consumers through its own website, as well as via all leading ecommerce and quick commerce platforms like Bigbasket, Zepto, Amazon, Flipkart, etc.  Ajeet says that in a decade, the company has touched over 15,000 retail points, with 180+ SKUs.  Apart from selling under its own brand name, Natureland Organics supplies products to other brands like Organic India, Bigbasket’s private label brand BB Royal Organic, and also Shark Tank fame Anveshan.  The brand also forayed into seed verticals recently by expanding into wheat, barley, mustard, grains, etc.  Seizing the market opportunity Ajeet says, a green wave is happening as people are becoming more health-conscious and thinking of the environment.  “Consumers today are more inclined to buy products that are sustainable and environmentally-friendly. Organic farming practices are often seen as more eco-friendly. This aligns with the broader trend towards sustainable and ethical consumption, making organic foods an appealing choice for consumers,” Ajeet highlights. At the same time, organic farms typically have more production costs. Ajeet says, Natureland Organics efficiently manages these costs through sustainable farming practices and supply chain optimisation, including utilising solar power and rainwater harvesting.   The organic food market in India has been making noise in the last decade and reached $1,582.2 million in 2023. According to IMARC Group, the market is expected to reach $8,918.5 million by 2032, exhibiting a growth rate of 21.19%. “Over the past decade, our growth has been exponential, allowing us to reach a position that legacy companies took years to attain. This shows the growing demand for organic food,” Ajeet adds.  Ajeet says there are also unscrupulous practices in this market, with some brands charging extremely high prices under the pretence of being organic. Natureland's product pricing varies according to the pack size. Pulses like a kg of Toor dal costs around Rs 265, Kabuli chana costs around Rs 310, and a litre of Mustard oil is priced at Rs 297.  Talking about future plans, he says that price war is a serious challenge right now, and since Natureland Organics wants to be a brand for masses, it will continue to thrive in the market. 
Efforts to increase demand for organic produce in the country have received a boost after the successful completion of an organic awareness campaign via influencer marketing on various social media platforms.
The influencer marketing campaign dubbed ‘Kilimohai organic’ spearheaded by Kenya Organic Agriculture Network (KOAN) has seen sales of organic farm produce generate Sh. 15 million in revenue in two years in selected organic retail outlets in Kenya.
Kilimohai Organic under the Organic Lifestyle Influencer Approach (OLIA) project was being implemented by the Research Institute of Organic Agriculture (FiBL) in collaboration with KOAN and WOWZI Technologies Limited to raise awareness on healthier eating and promote the consumption of organic foods in the country through organic promotion on social media.
KOAN Programmes Officer Martin Njoroge, while speaking to stakeholders during the end-of-project unveiling meeting in Nairobi said that for the last two years, under the implementation of the OLIA project, sales of organic foods purchased at selected retail outlets hit a record high as compared to previous years.
“Kilimohai organic influencer marketing project started in July 2021 and concluded in December 2023. During this period, the organization has seen a surge in sales of organic foods,” said Njoroge
He further said they were able to see additional revenue of about Sh. 5.3 million from the different outlets in three months, a growth from what they had in previous years.
Njoroge divulged that under the implementation of the OLIA project, over 5 million consumers were reached through various social media platforms like Facebook, TikTok, Instagram and X (Formerly Twitter).
KOAN was able to build ‘farm influencers’ from their organic farmer’s pool in Kenya, who are now able to command followings to boost engagement and followership to generate demand for organic foods on their various social media platforms
FiBL digital marketing and educationalist expert, Maestrini Nicoletta said that joint projects of FiBL and KOAN have been important drivers for the development of the organic market in Kenya.
“Influencer marketing campaigns create consumer awareness and generate demand,” said Nicoletta, adding that this stimulates healthier diets for consumers while promoting environmentally friendly and income-enhancing agricultural production in the country.
She said that FiBL would like to capitalize on the positive outcomes of the project through a possible ‘regional project’ in East Africa that would create consumer awareness and generate demand for organic foods.
“The successful implementation of the OLIA project has laid the foundation of promoting regional exchange and trade, strengthening participatory guarantee systems farmer group training and certification, and expanding consumer awareness activities,” she said.
WOWZI Technologies representative Lilian Mbithe said they created an influencer marketing platform designed to help KOAN automate influencer marketing workflow and programs to run Kilimohai organic campaign among other tasks.
“40 organic farmers were selected and trained to create social media accounts, create awareness of sustainable organic farming practices to increase organic sales of farmers through organic promotion on social media platforms’ she said.
Further, she noted that over 200 content creators in Kenya were contracted to upgrade their influencer profile on social media platforms with organic contents and run a campaign for healthy, organic foods to generate demand.
Social media has become an integral part of our daily life in Kenya, with millions of people actively engaging on various platforms like Facebook, TikTok, Instagram and X.
Statistics, according to GWI (Q3 2022) show that some of the commonly used social media platforms in Kenya by individuals aged between 16 and 64 years include Facebook (17.5 percent), TikTok (17 percent), Instagram (12.6 percent) and Twitter (8.5 percent).
Solomon Njoroge Ndegwa a youthful organic farmer in Gatundu, Kiambu county with expertise in organic agriculture speaking at the event said the genesis of his farm influencer journey started when he took part in a comprehensive training session on social media under OLIA project.
“I learnt my first campaign brief which was aimed at raising awareness on the organic sustainable supply system, and further shedding light on how farmers transport their organic produce to retail outlets in Nairobi,” he said.
Ndegwa opined that implementation of the teaching of the project has expanded his facebook presence and witnessed remarkable growth from 1000 followers to 3700 followers.
“One can become a champion by joining Kilimohai organic community and create positive impact on people around the world by using some of the hashtags  #Getorganified #Iamorganified #kilimohai on facebook and twitter @kilimohai_ke @koankenya.
Kilimohai organic certified products are cultivated without the use of toxic chemicals. They embody the aspiration to foster a healthier wholesome way of life.
Kilimohai is a trusted standard mark of certified organic produce originating from Kenya and East Africa. The Kenyan Organic Agriculture Network (KOAN) supervises and authorizes the use of this mark in Kenya.
Farming For The Future: How Organic Practices Are Reshaping India’s Agricultural Landscape
Uncover the myriad benefits, stark disparities, and profound impacts on consumers and the environment in this illuminating exploration of India's organic agriculture revolution.
In the vibrant tapestry of India’s agricultural landscape, a green revolution of a different kind is taking root—organic farming. As consumers increasingly seek food that not only nourishes their bodies but also sustains the environment, organic produce has emerged as a beacon of health and sustainability. Championing this cause is Varun Madan, CEO & Founder of Salad Days, who advocates for the transformative power of organic farming. 
Organic farming in India has seen significant growth and attention in recent years, driven by both consumer demand for healthier food options and a broader movement towards sustainable agriculture. As Varun Madan, CEO & Founder of Salad Days, points out, there are several key benefits to choosing organic produce from a consumer standpoint.
“Organically grown food is zero or much lower on residual synthetic chemicals and is proven to be richer in nutrients, certain antioxidants & Omega 3 fatty acids as compared to conventionally grown products,” says Madan. “Hence, consuming organic food means consuming cleaner, safer, and healthier food.”
Moreover, organic farming practices are inherently better for environmental health and reduce the public health risks associated with conventional farming methods. The emphasis on biodiversity, soil fertility, water health, and animal welfare in organic farming contributes to a more sustainable and resilient agricultural system.
In India, consumers can make more informed choices when purchasing organic food by looking for certifications such as the unified logo with the “Jaivik Bharat” tagline or the “India Organic” certification for packaged products. However, for perishables like fruits, vegetables, and milk, certifications may be rare, and consumers should inquire about the source and growing practices.
Madan advises, “Buying organic products at a similar price as conventional products may never get us truly organic food because, in most cases, the yield of organic farming is costlier & lesser to produce.” This underscores the importance of understanding the true cost and value of organic food.
Diving deeper into the differences between organic and conventional farming methods, it becomes evident that the philosophies driving each approach are fundamentally distinct. “In conventional farming, emphasis is only on the quantity and quality of the produce, while in organic farming, the emphasis is on the health of the overall system,” explains Madan. “Organic farming prohibits the use of GMO seeds and synthetic chemicals for crop nutrition or crop care, relying instead on natural principles like biodiversity, crop rotation, composting, cover cropping, and no-tillage.” These differences have a direct impact on the end product, with organic produce being lower in chemical residues and richer in nutrients compared to its conventionally grown counterparts. 
“Eating locally and seasonal produce supports organic farming and vice versa,” notes Madan. Additionally, consuming local and seasonal produce reduces the carbon footprint associated with long-distance transportation and supports community-based agriculture. This approach fosters a closer connection between consumers and the food they eat while promoting sustainable practices that benefit the environment. Efforts to make organic food more accessible to a broader demographic are underway, driven by evolving consumer behaviour, government initiatives, and increased awareness.
In conclusion, organic farming in India offers a pathway to healthier, safer, and more sustainable food production.
Is organic farming the solution to fight food insecurity?
Consumers and legislators in the EU are pushing for food production methods that neutralise carbon emissions. What impact will this have on food availability, costs, exports and imports? Lindi Botha asked Michaël Wilde, director of Bionext in the Netherlands, a body that represents the organic food industry.
Do you foresee that food production in the Netherlands will decrease due to more stringent regulations from the Green Deal?
Would it be a bad thing if it did? If we consume less meat and dairy products then it would be beneficial. Some 80% of our agricultural land is used to produce animal protein, of which most is feed for livestock.
This is not the most efficient way for us to get our protein and we are running into a lot of problems in the Netherlands as a result.
We have a huge problem where the soils are so full of nitrogen it is running off into the water systems. We are European champions in biodiversity loss and 99% of our water is polluted.
Although we are getting a lot of ‘cheap’ food, the external effects are negative. We are all in agreement, including conventional farmers, that we need to change the way we grow and consume food.
The Green Deal stipulates that we need to reach a 50% reduction in pesticide use, and a 20% reduction in synthetic fertilisers by 2050. These are goals we are very happy about.
In the Netherlands, organic farmers make up 4% of the farming sector, and our goal is to get to 15% this year, and eventually 25% as per the Green Deal’s specifications. That leaves 75% of food production that can be farmed conventionally.
The whole transition to greener food production means that we need to rethink how we are producing food.
Not all the land on which we currently produce animal protein and feed for livestock can be transitioned to human food crops, but we need to be very critical of where we grow what.
Is it smart to be growing barley and oats to feed animals instead of making bread or other food for people? Importing soya from South America, where rainforests are being cut down, to feed our animals is not a smart way to produce food.
Consuming game meat from gazelles roaming the Karoo, on the other hand, has minimal environmental impact and would be a perfectly suitable protein source for South Africans.
Would the planned reduction of animal protein production in the European Union not lead to counter-balanced diets?
We should all be eating a more vegetarian and plant-based diet. Animal protein should be more of a luxury item that we eat a few times a week – not every day in big quantities.
Some of the biggest problems we are seeing in the environment are as a result of animal farming. Animal husbandry is the largest emitter of emissions within the agriculture sector.
Furthermore, we need to change our whole outlook on animals and how we treat them.
In 20 years’ time we are going to look back to the years we treated animals like we do today, considering what we know about what animals feel and their level of intelligence, and be appalled.
With regards to South Africa, I’ve seen the portions of meat you eat – it’s huge. As a human being, you don’t need that amount of protein in one sitting. Ideally you should be having 100g of meat a few times a week, not every day.
If South Africans can just reduce the portions of meat they eat and include more salad it will already go a long way to greater sustainability.
In the Netherlands, this topic is front and centre and I realise that there are many more pressing issues in South Africa, but I would strongly advise South Africans to rethink their diets, especially those who can afford to do so.
Does organic farming not create more waste since there is more ‘imperfect’ food being produced that has no market?
Organic is not just about not using pesticides to prevent damage to produce. It’s about the whole approach to farming to work in harmony with nature. It’s like a person that gets enough sleep, eats healthy and maintains overall health.
The chances of you getting ill and being susceptible to viruses is less than if you spent your whole life in hospital on a food drip. We have seen that in farming systems where nature is in balance, plants are far healthier and more robust.
They can better withstand pests and diseases and so require far less chemical input.
In organic livestock production, the veterinary costs are 50% less than conventionally farmed meat.
As a society we need to learn to accept a spot on an apple or avocado and not expect picture-perfect fruit if we want to reduce our waste.
Will organic farming make food more expensive?
It will make food more valuable. Food is already expensive, but the full cost is not paid at the grocery store, but rather through the health system and taxation to be able to clean the water systems, invest in fighting climate change and mitigating its effects.
If we take into account what is causing climate change, like the production and use of synthetic fertilisers, we see the true cost of producing food, and then organic food, with its many benefits, does not seem that expensive at all.
We need to look at the value of food far more closely and ensure that those who can’t afford healthy food can still have access to it.
But what needs to be addressed is people who don’t want to pay €0,20 (R3,96) more for a kilogram of organic produce, but are flying around the world a few times a year to go on holiday, going to Starbucks for fancy takeaway cappuccinos.
This is the conversation I want to be having. It’s not a black-and-white situation where people have the excuse that they can’t afford to pay for organic food.
Then there is also the issue of food waste. We are throwing away one third of all the food we produce and this is an extremely bad situation.
When you don’t have a big income and most of it needs to go to food then you don’t throw any of it away.
But in the Netherlands, where food expenditure makes up 11% of household spending, throwing food away is done without much thought or concern.
The argument has been made that if the Netherlands decreased food production to meet climate goals, it would have no impact on food availability, only on the amount available for export. Do you think reducing exports is feasible?
There are two types of exports – we are part of the EU and we export to our neighbours. I have no problem with that.
My problem is that rainforests in South America are being cut down to plant soya which we are then importing to feed our dairy cows, creating all the associated environmental problems in the Netherlands, and then exporting this milk as baby formula to China.
I would prefer that we rather take our expertise to China to set up factories there to produce formula for that market, using cow feed produced in that country.
Then we don’t have a problem that is created in South America and the Netherlands, all to feed Chinese babies.
The excuse of not wanting to reduce exports is often used by those who don’t want to reform the agricultural system, because exports contribute to the country’s economy.
But we are not asking the farmers to stop producing food. We are asking them to switch to organic meat production, for example, which has 70% less nitrogen emissions and is better for animal welfare.
Organic farming does not pollute water systems, does not contribute to climate change and contributes to healthy soils. Those that are producing in organic systems should be getting higher prices so they can sustain production while protecting the environment.
But there needs to be political will for this to happen. Yes, there will be less milk if everyone switches to organic dairy farming, but if the farmer gets more per litre then it does not come with negative effects for the farmer.
Eateries in the Netherlands assure patrons that their menu is in line with climate goals.
If you look at the amount of cappuccinos people buy every day, if we were to switch to organic milk, which only costs €0,10 (R1,98) more per litre than conventional milk, it would reward the farmers and the environment, and the consumer would not be unnecessarily burdened.
So I am in discussion with the national trade authority in the Netherlands to get coffee outlets to switch to organic milk.
Some supermarkets here have announced they will only be selling organic potatoes. Some consumers say they want to be greener outside of the store, but when they enter, they somehow become a different person and then they don’t want to pay for the greener option.
We can’t expect much from consumers; instead we need to reduce their choice for buying non-green. Food companies are being accused of being part of the problem, so I expect that we will be seeing more food companies making procurement decisions like this in favour of the climate.
There are a lot of new innovations that will reduce methane emissions in livestock farming. Why is the focus then skewed towards reducing output?
This story is being held up by conventional farmers as an excuse not to change. They’re saying, ‘don’t worry everyone, go back to sleep, technology will solve the problem’.
But the problems are so big we need to take every avenue we can to bring down emissions.
If this technology really works, then great, but we still need to look at farming more sustainably.
should not happen is that we all go back to business as usual and then in 15 years’ time wake up again to the fact that we didn’t do enough when we had the chance.
We can’t just ignore the issue and trust the farmer to feed the right additives and employ the right technology to bring down emissions while not making any other changes to the way in which they are farming.
to say we will see any real progress if we don’t address the core issue. Emissions are just less with organic farming, so why not just convert?
Change is difficult. There are all kinds of stages and challenges you face when you make drastic changes in your way of operating, and government needs to assist farmers in this transition in whatever way they can to make sure it happens.
The focus in Europe is on sustainability, whereas the focus in Africa is about availability and affordability. Climate emissions are of no concern to those struggling to feed themselves.
It is understandable that sustainability is not a big focus in Africa. When you look at Maslow’s Hierarchy of Needs, food availability is the most important priority; focusing on environmental issues would be the least important and only given attention when all the other needs are met.
The EU has done a lot to mess up the world – socially, environmentally – so we have a lot to account for. It’s our responsibility to fix the problems.
Many farmers in Africa are already part of the solution because they are farming in harmony with nature in extensive systems. To expect them to ‘pay’ for climate change is unfair.
I agree that there is an arrogance in the West that we have now realised our mistakes and are preaching to everyone, telling them to get on board with the changes that need to be made to lower carbon emissions.

India has the world’s fastest-growing population, and although they are predominantly vegetarian, there is a shift towards meat consumption. To tell them now that they should not be eating meat to save the planet is pretty arrogant.
Yes, it would make a huge difference to emissions if China and India were not to increase meat consumption, but who are we to dictate, after we have been enjoying meat for all these years?
The discussion around organic farming can be polarising. What do you think is key to advancing this cause?
Collaboration between all stakeholders in the food industry is needed to realise our goals. The organic sector can’t operate independently from the conventional farming sector.
If we don’t collaborate with input suppliers, even those in the chemical industry, we will struggle to transform our food industry.
Farmer organisations, supermarkets, NGOs, government and the private sector need to work together to ensure all the supporting links in the chain are there.
The consumer side also needs to be involved because they need to realise that ‘perfect’ food is harming the planet.
Produce comes in all shapes and sizes, and expecting everything to conform to packaging or our idea of what it must look like is not helpful.
In the Netherlands we talk about verbinding – this means we bring people together from all sectors within the industry to the table.
It is no use being in a polarised position where all we do is say how bad conventional farming is, and how everyone should switch to organic. We need to be involved in mainstream discussions, otherwise organic will never become mainstream.
Organic farming advocates have called for a "radical rethink" of the sector to help food producers reap the benefits of a growing UK market.
Soil Association Certification has published its 2024 Organic Market Report, which reveals the sector has delivered its 12th consecutive year of growth, despite global political and economic turmoil, and the cost-of-living crisis.
The report says the total market grew 2pc in 2023, ending the year at £3.2bn – almost double its value in 2011.
But while shoppers are spending more money organic food, the amount of organic farmland in the UK has remained static at around 3pc – illustrating the market's heavy reliance on imports.
Soil Association Certification commercial director Alex Cullen said this means UK farms - and the environment - are missing out on the potential benefits of organic agriculture.

"The market and macro trends are pointing to an upward trajectory but there are still many challenges and barriers to the level of growth that UK organic should be delivering for farmers – with price the biggest barrier," he said.
“We need a radical rethink if organic is going to reach its full potential and bring organic farming into the mainstream. The entire supply chain must work together to grow the market and unlock demand for homegrown UK organic fresh produce, supported by the government.
“And we can learn valuable lessons from Europe where there is greater support and commitment from governments and retailers for farmers and from some exciting innovations taking place right here across the UK – to make organic more available and affordable."
Norfolk farmer Joe Rolfe is managing director of specialist organic root vegetable business RBOrganic, which is part of Burgess Farms group and based at Houghton, near Fakenham.
He said: “The organic market in 2022 was tough due to inflation and the cost of living crisis but in 2023 organic sales returned to a more positive trajectory and are heading in the right direction.
“Organic growers need to be rewarded with fair prices and supported by effective environmental schemes that balance environmental outcomes with food production.
"When you look at places like Denmark and Germany, growers are supported in a more proactive manner by government."

Agriculture Minister N Cheluvarayaswamy on Wednesday emphasized the need to create awareness among the students about the importance of Organic food. Bengaluru: Agriculture Minister N Cheluvarayaswamy on Wednesday emphasized the need to create awareness among the students about the importance of Organic food. "Organic food is the future staple food of the people. We need to conduct a vigorous campaign to promote Millets among the students," said Cheluvarayaswamy. The Agriculture Minister was speaking after inaugurating an unique campaign "Let's eat millet and encourage Organic food at the Christ College here. The campaign was jointly organised by the Department of Agriculture, Peace Practice and Department of Media Studies of the Christ College. According to Cheluvarayaswamy, Christ College has a variety of food habits and this is a perfect environment to encourage Organic food culture. "The world is facing serious problems due to food habits and lifestyle. A widespread discussion is taking place on food habits. It has been proved beyond doubt that if we set our food habits, a number of health problems can be avoided," the Agriculture Minister explained. Stating that Organic food not only gives strength to the body but also provides stability in the long run, Cheluvarayaswamy said Organic food especially millets are cost-effective. 
"The farmers are getting profit after they adopt Organic farming as it is cost-effective. Organic food has received international attention and obtained a global market. Emphasis has been laid on branding," Cheluvarayaswamy added. He disclosed that a three-day conference on Millets has been organised from January 5 at Bangalore Palace Grounds. International experts will throw light on the importance and advantages of Millets and Organic food. "I expect the students to be present in the conference in order to learn more about Millets and Organic food," the Agriculture Minister said. In his address, Dr Father Joseph, Vice Chancellor of Christ University, said an awareness is being created on Millets and Organic food. "Let me tell you today. I have been using millets for breakfast as well as for lunch for a very long time. I expect every student to start using Millets and Organic food," he added. Agriculture Commissioner N. Y. Patil, and Director of the Department of Agriculture G. T Puthra were present on the occasion.

The role of certification in organic market: Ensuring transparency and trust
It plays a pivotal serveing as a guarantee that agri products meet stringent standards, assuring consumers of adherence to environmentally friendly and sustainable practices
The global organic market is experiencing a remarkable surge. This is driven by increasing consumer awareness and growing demand for healthier and sustainable food options. In India as well the organic food sector is witnessing a significant shift in preferences. Consumers are seeking products that align with principles of sustainability, mindfulness and environmental consciousness.
The ready-to-eat (RTE) sector is witnessing a surge in demand for food that is convenient, organic, and nutritious. India holds a special place among the 187 nations that practice organic agriculture, With 9.12 million acres, India is home to 30 per cent of all organic producers globally. With the increase in demand for organic produce, there is a need for a robust system to validate and guarantee the authenticity of organic products. This is where certifications come in. Certifications ensure transparency and authenticity.
Consumers turn health conscious
India’s organic market has witnessed growth especially post-pandemic. Consumers, primarily in the urban landscape have become more health-conscious and environmentally aware. Despite the promising trajectory, the Indian organic market faces challenges. There is a considerable gap in awareness and understanding of organic farming practices among consumers. Additionally, con-cerns about the authenticity of organic products persist. Certifications help in overcoming these challenges.
Here’s how
• Trust building - Certification plays a pivotal role in the organic market. They act as a quality assurance mechanism for consumers and a market differentiator for producers. It serves as a guarantee that agricultural products meet stringent organic standards, assuring consumers of adherence to environmentally friendly and sustainable practices. Certification fosters trust in the organic label, empowering consumers to make informed choices.
Awareness
Several certifications contribute to the credibility of organic products in India. The India Organic certification, USDA Organic, and Jaivik Bharat are among the prominent standards. In a survey conducted by Rakuten Insight about the awareness among Indian consumers regarding various certifications of organic food products in September 2023, India Organic was the certification that most respondents were aware of, accounting for 74 per cent followed by the EU Certified Organic food label accounting for approximately 30 per cent of the respondents.
• Lucrative opportunities - For producers, organic certification opens access to a lucrative market, as consumers increasingly prioritize health and sustainability. In the financial year 2020, the organic packaged food market size was about 11 billion Indian rupees in India. It is projected to increase to 30 billion Indian rupees in the fiscal year 2030. Consumers are willing to pay a premium for certified organic products and that is a key driver of market growth. The certifications not only cater to the domestic market but also enhance export opportunities for organic produce.

• Standardisation - The global comparison of certification standards is crucial for the harmonisation of organic trade. Collaboration between certification bodies worldwide and the recognition of certifications on the global stage contribute to establishing a consistent framework. Ultimately, certification not only ensures the integrity of organic products but also plays a vital role in shaping consumer perceptions and driving the growth of the organic market.
Challenges in the ecosystem
While the certifications stand as a hallmark for organic produce, it is important to also note that the certification ecosystem faces some challenges.
1. Certifications may be difficult for small scale producers: the rigorous upkeep of certifications poses challenges, particularly for small community farmers. For many, the adminis-trative burdens and costs involved make it a formidable endeavour.
2. Organic is no necessarily healthy: It’s crucial for consumers to recognise that the ‘organic’ label doesn’t automatically translate to ‘healthy.’ Despite the genuine efforts of most organic producers, the commercial value of the term often attracts individuals seeking financial gain rather than sustainable practices. Loopholes in certification may allow for the inclusion of additives that compromise the integrity of organic products. A certified organic label, unfortunately, doesn’t guarantee a completely organic or wholesome product. For instance, mayonnaise has oil and egg as the main ingredients. While both can be organic but mayonnaise is not necessarily healthy. Therefore, it is important for consumers to ensure mindful eating.
3. Certifications need additional support: In India, the certification process requires addi-tional support to align with the ethos of organic farming, urging a collective effort to refine the system. Organic certification, though a regulated process, faces scrutiny regarding its ability to reflect the overall health of the land. While it ensures the absence of synthetic fertilizers and pesticides, it doesn’t inherently convey improvements in land health. The debate over the ade-quacy of organic designations prompts contemplation on the broader vision of organic farming, transcending mere certifications to uphold the well-being of animals, plants, and humans.
Certifications are important because they foster trust among consumers, and ensure transparency, paving the way for a positive impact on the sector’s growth. However, the potential pitfalls and the need for continued improvement need to be addressed to ensure unparalleled growth of the sector in India.
The time to do organic farming is now
Matching our strengths to opportunities, for the sake of farmers and consumers
For Malta, organic farming is an excellent example of a viable business opportunity within a strategy that hinges around quality rather than quantity. This message is not new. Since joining the European Union, we have continuously been told how our agricultural competitivity should rely on value and quality.
In organic farming, this competitive advantage is given by the label. The logo – the widely recognised Euro-leaf – provides distinction in the market. The organic label represents trust in a system that is heavy on regulations and controls. These are all brand elements that most businesses are willing to pay for as part of their commercial strategy.
Organic farming delivers food that a growing segment of consumers want, as it comes wrapped in the guarantee that it is free from certain residues. Compared to 2015, the EU organic retail sales almost doubled in 2020, and the area under organic farming grew by 41 per cent. It is not to say that in organic farming no pesticides are used, as the use of certain substances is permitted.
In its basic form, organic farming is a step backwards, towards a system that is more respectful of nature and its cycles. It is one of the solutions to the problems of modern agriculture, with its greenhouse gas emissions, erosion of soil quality and biodiversity, and the intensive use of artificial inputs. The four principles of organic agriculture – health, ecology, fairness, and care – are fundamentals for any type of sustainable production, while many of the methods used in organic farming – crop rotation, use of natural predators, etc. – are not at all different to those used by our farmers in traditional agriculture since antiquity.

Does pest management remain a problem? Yes, but then, how is pest management not a problem in conventional farming? While it is true that outside organic farming, farmers can turn to novel technology, including a wider choice of pesticides and pest-resistant varieties from genetic modification and the more recent New Genomic Techniques, the risks of crop failure remain. I have met farmers who lost the entire harvest of their vineyard during the organic transition period, but I have also met others who have switched to organic farming simply because they tried an ‘organic pesticide’ and it worked.
For Malta, the EU’s Green Deal target to have 25 per cent of EU agricultural land under organic farming by 2030, was a trigger for action. We seized the opportunity to “support organic operators in a tailored manner” and calculated the new funding. Today, the rates of financial compensation we are offering our farmers through the national Strategic Plan as an incentive to transition to organic farming – €492 and €362 per tumolo per year, for arable crops and trees respectively – are some of the highest across the EU, and up to 3.6 times the rates in previous programmes.
What about yield? Our own funding is based upon an average organic yield gap of 35 per cent. This comes from studies by De Ponti, Tomek, Bert Rijk, and Martin K. Van Ittersum covering 362 datasets and 43 countries worldwide, showing that organic yields of individual crops are on average 80 per cent of conventional yields, with a standard variation of 21 per cent, coupled with the fact that Malta ranks in the lower quartile vis-à-vis other European countries in terms of conventional horticultural output per hectare. With time, this organic yield gap is expected to decline.
Our vision to transform our food and agricultural systems and to make organic a viable choice is led by the need to offer consumers high quality local organic food whilst driving sustainable income for Maltese and Gozitan producers. Malta’s first national action plan for organic food puts in place the infrastructure that is needed to implement this vision. With its 10 objectives and 18 actions, Malta’s plan addresses the challenges around access to land, finance, knowledge, and infrastructure, and builds three pillars of support, creating the right set of conditions for organic producers, policy makers, and markets to function better.
Our plan is ambitious. We aim to substantially increase organic agricultural land in Malta from 0.6 per cent to five per cent, representing a near ten-fold increase in just seven years. To do this, we took a bold decision, choosing to view the EU target as an opportunity for financing change rather than as a burden and an obligation. We took courage from those 28 certified organic producers who continue to pass the audits and deliver organic food every year. It is not impossible to have organic farming in Malta. Is it difficult? Yes, but then again, that is general farming for you, with its constant struggle against the harsh elements of nature.
We are not putting all our eggs in one basket; organic farming is one of the solutions to the decline in agriculture and a possibility for the diversification and celebration of the local product.
Let’s not forget that according to the latest Census of Agriculture for 2020, 67.5 per cent of our utilised agricultural land is not producing food for humans.
Let us look towards a future where agriculture is seen as a viable economic opportunity rather than a burden passed on from father to son.

Let’s not forget the shift to organic farming is voluntary, but we can work together using our small size and our resilient and resourceful nature for agility and adaptability.
Two problems plaguing Thailand – unhealthy meals for schoolkids and farmers threatened by volatile food prices and climate change – have a simple win-win solution, say experts.

By collaborating with local farmers, schools can get fresh and pesticide-free organic food for their students at a reasonable price, ensuring that the farmers earn a stable income.
It may sound too good to be true, but a project in the Northeast is proving otherwise and could serve as a national model.
Success story in the Northeast
Students in Surin’s Chom Phra district are now being served a hearty school lunch made from locally grown organic vegetables every day. This meal provides them with the nutrition they need for healthy physical and mental development.

But the Chom Phra students are among the lucky few. Many of their peers across Thailand still have to be satisfied with small servings of relatively poor-quality food that may be stunting their development.

Chinda Phromtha, a dentist at the Lamduan Hospital who has overseen the school lunch program in Chom Phra from the start, attributes its success to close collaboration between district schools and local farmers.
“Initially, we faced the same problems as other schools – our students did not have good, healthy food for lunch. Meanwhile farmers in our district were always suffering financial instability from fluctuating food prices.
“So, in 2014, we began coordinating with local farmers of organic produce to cater to local schools – and it worked!” Chinda said.
Every semester, all 40 schools in Chom Phra district provide farmers with an estimate of the amount of food they will require over the entire semester. This way, farmers can plan how much they should produce in advance.
“The outcome of this partnership has been astounding: Not only are more than 5,000 students in local schools eating healthier meals, but it is also helping communities earn more by selling their organic produce to us,” she said.
The program is also greatly benefiting the campaign to promote organic farming practices, as farmers know that they will always have regular customers for their organic produce, she added.
Unsafe food and intensive farming
Despite a few good examples like the Chom Phra program, the poor quality of food served in schools is a long-simmering national issue.
The problem has been blamed for eroding Thai children’s mental and physical development, as the food they are served in school is often of poor nutritional value, fails to meet their dietary demands and can be contaminated with pesticides and other chemicals.
Withoon Lianchamroon, director of BioThai Foundation, points to several signs that Thai students are being served unhealthy lunches. He said evidence indicates that the proportion of malnourished children is rising, while their IQ levels are dropping.
“This is clearly because these children do not get the nutrition they need for their growth, while the food they are served in school is contaminated with agrochemicals that inevitably affect their brain development,” Withoon said.
While a large number of students in Thailand are deprived of vital nutrients in their diet, farmers across the country are also suffering from an unsustainable food production system. This is because they are forced to opt for intensive farming and have to sell their crops cheaply to middlemen.
“Over the past decade, the government has been spending hundreds of billions of baht subsidizing the agricultural industry, yet the farmers are still poor. Every year, tonnes of vegetables and fruits are wasted, yet our children are served far fewer fruits and vegetables than they should be,” Withoon said.
Furthermore, he said that even though the government claims to be supporting organic farming, organic farmers still do not get enough backing. Meanwhile, their lack of access to markets also makes them financially unstable, which again deters others from switching to organic farming.
“With the world facing a climate crisis, our food production system is in great danger. We need to swiftly transform our food production to become more sustainable, by empowering local farmers’ capacity to shift from intensive, chemical-heavy farming to organic farming, which benefits not just consumers but also the entire planet,” he said.
Solution is collaboration
Sumeth Panchamlong from the Thailand Alternative Agriculture Network said he was very concerned about the state of school meals, pointing out that many students – especially those from poor families in rural areas – depend on their school lunch for nutrition.
“In this modern society, many families do not have time to prepare meals for their children, so they have to rely on school lunches. However, it turns out that the food served to children at school is often unhealthy and unfit to support their growth,” Sumeth said.

While studying food procurement by schools in Maha Sarakham province, Sumeth learned that most schools opt for cheap, low-grade ingredients that they can afford with their limited budgets.

In the 24 years since Thailand launched the policy of free school meals for every student in 1999, the school-lunch budget has risen by just 11 baht per head, according to BioThai Foundation. The budget currently stands at between 22 and 36 baht per head and has been unchanged since 2022.

Sumeth stressed that with such a limited budget, schools inevitably have to choose the cheapest available option on the market. And invariably, the cheapest available food is heavily contaminated with pesticides, which are unsafe for children. The only way to tackle this problem is to open the door to organic farmers.

“Local communities have a key role to play in ensuring that our children eat healthy at school. The only way we can be sure that the ingredients used in school lunches are toxin-free is if the school links up with local organic farmers. They should also work together to teach students how to grow their own food and become self-reliant,” he said.

“Given that we already have many models which prove that collaboration between local farmers and schools is achievable, it is tragic to see that most of our children still have to eat unsafe food, while many organic farmers are struggling to sell their produce.”

The U.S. organic industry has shown healthy growth over the past few years. Its sales are outpacing those of comparable conventionally produced food and nonfood items, according to an industry survey. Driven by consumer choice, between 2020 and 2021, the organic food sector surpassed $57.5 billion in total value.

What qualifies as an organic product?
According to the U.S. Department of Agriculture, there are several standards products must meet in order to receive an “organic” label. Animal-based food products can be classified as organic if the animals they came from were not raised with antibiotics or growth hormones.

Other foods can be classified as organic if they were produced without conventional pesticides, synthetic fertilizers, bioengineering, sewage byproducts or ionizing radiation. A USDA-certified agent must also sign off on the production of any organic foods. Conventional foods, on the other hand, aren’t held to these standards.

Value of organic food sales
Overall sales in the organic industry reached more than $63 billion between 2020 and 2021, according to findings from an Organic Trade Association (OTA) survey. The organic food and beverage sector made up more than 90% of these sales. The survey found that organic food sales grew by 2% ($1.4 billion) during this period. The organic nonfood sector reached $6 billion in total sales.

Why organic sales are increasing
An empirical study published in the open-source scientific journal PLoS One in 2021 analyzes consumers’ motivation for buying organic foods. The study attributes the growth of organic sales to consumers becoming more conscious about their health. Many people believe organic foods contribute to a healthier diet than conventional foods.

Consumers have also become more concerned with the environmental effects of food production processes. Chemical fertilizers and synthetic substances can be harmful to the environment and, in turn, to consumers’ health. As a result, many consumers are more willing to purchase environmentally sustainable and organic products.

Many companies are embracing green trends and creating marketing strategies that further encourage shoppers to purchase organic products. As a result, more people are taking the time to learn about the potential benefits of consuming organic foods and using organic products.

Did You Know?
In 2020, more than 94 million Americans purchased or used organic foods.

Who is most likely to buy organic products?
In the PLoS One study, the researchers analyzed the responses of the 279 participants who said they use organic products. They then considered demographic data such as each consumer’s age, gender, and income and education levels. The results show that consumers between the ages of 41 and 50 years of age are most likely to purchase organic products.

People with higher education and income levels are also more likely to buy organic foods. The results, however, do not suggest that a consumer’s gender affects their decision to purchase organic foods.

Growth of organic food sales outpaces conventional food sales
Research from BlueWeave Consulting predicts the organic food market will grow at an annual rate of 8.7%. At this rate, the market will be worth more than $95 billion by 2027. By comparison, the overall food industry is expected to grow by 3.8% annually through 2027.

As sales in the organic food sector continue to increase, the industry’s sales growth is, in some cases, outpacing that of some conventional food categories. For example, the Organic Produce Network’s annual produce report shows that the value of organic produce sales rose by 5.5% in 2021. The number of sales in this food category also increased by more than 2%. The value of conventional produce sales, on the other hand, increased by only 1.9% during this time. The sales volume of these foods decreased by 2.1%.

The growth of organic grains sales has also exceeded conventional grains sales. Organic flour sales, for example, rose by 51% from 2019 to 2020, while overall flour sales increased by 33%. To tap into these increasing profits, more crop farmers are moving away from conventional practices and are adhering to organic farming standards.

Key Takeaway
In some categories, such as produce and grains, organic food sales are growing faster than conventional food sales. Research suggests overall annual food sales will grow at a higher annual rate than conventional food sales.

Sales trends among organic food categories
The OTA survey found that organic fruit and vegetable sales totaled more than $21 billion in 2021. This amount was 4.5% higher than that of 2020. Organic dairy and egg sales increased by nearly 11% from 2019 to 2021. Organic meat sales reached nearly $2 billion in 2021, with poultry leading the category with more than $1 billion in sales.

Many customers are moving toward consuming more fresh foods instead of pantry items, causing a decline in preprepared and -packaged organic food sales. These sales fell by about 5% in 2021.

Near the start of the COVID-19 pandemic, many customers rushed to stock up on products such as canned soup, pasta sauce and nut butters. However, these sales decreased the most of all items within this organic food category in 2021. Organic snacks and baby food were the two products in this category whose sales had a healthy increase. They rose by 11% and 6%, respectively, in 2021.

Organic beverage sales increased in 2021 by 8%. With more people now working from home, organic coffee sales reached more than $2 billion that year. And as stay-at-home restrictions were lifted, many Americans were less reliant on baking to keep them busy. As a result, organic bread and grain sales plateaued around $6.2 billion. 

Going organic means going forward
Only in one place is organic food growth set to potentially decline. The OTA predicts that international effects from the war in Ukraine could prevent organic grain sales from growing considerably in the near future. However, in virtually all other organic sales categories, great small business ideas abound. Acting on them could be a great way to build a thriving operation.

NH discontinues organic certification program, leaving farmers to find other options
New Hampshire’s Department of Agriculture announced this week that it’s discontinuing the state-run organic certification program, forcing many local organic farmers to search for new options to allow them to bring their products to markets.
To sell products labeled as organic, farmers must be certified by an accredited agent. Those that are currently using the state’s program need to find new agents or surrender their certification by April 27.
The state’s program charged significantly smaller fees than the industry standard, according to the Northeast Organic Farmers Association of New Hampshire, or NOFA-NH, meaning farmers may now face higher costs to sell organic products.
For some farmers, losing the ability to have a New Hampshire-specific certification could be an obstacle, especially those with customers focused on shopping locally, NOFA-NH said in a statement to NHPR. And as the growing season begins, the timing of the decision came as a challenge.
“It does add stress during a busy time of year when farmers are seeding all their starts and preparing for the season ahead,” the organization said.
The announcement came just days after New Hampshire lawmakers voted down a bill that would have provided about $220,000 to the state’s Department of Agriculture, Markets and Food to hire one full-time and one part-time organic certification inspector for one year.
New Hampshire Agriculture Commissioner Shawn Jasper said his agency was spending a lot of time and money on organic certification, in part because federal rules added additional requirements in the years since the state’s program began in 1987.
“And yet we never had any staff added,” Jasper said. “We just continued to do more with the same amount.”
Jasper said inspectors haven’t had time to do other kinds of inspections outside of the organic program, like looking into the sale of expired seeds, or analyzing fertilizer and feed — but when they’ve done requested inspections, they’ve found violations.
“We can't continue to do something that we don't have funding for at the expense of all these other things that many more people depend on,” he said.
State officials said they intended to continue the program through the 2024 season and reassess next year. But then, the department learned one employee would be out for 12 weeks during the growing season, and decided to end the program effective June 30, 2024.
Organic certifications for livestock, wild crops, and processing and handling were discontinued abruptly in 2021. At the time, Jasper said short staffing was the cause of those cuts, too.
When those programs were discontinued, Jasper said, he believes a number of farms decided to forego organic certification entirely due to the cost, but the state does not record numbers of farms certified by others.
Jasper said the department considered raising its fees for organic certification, but expected a number of farmers would stop using their program, and those who stayed would have to pay almost twice the cost other certifiers charge.
“We are a state without a sales or income tax,” Jasper said. “We’re essentially a department that is not supported with general funds.”
NOFA-NH said the organization appreciated that Jasper collaborated with them throughout the past few months and allowed farmers some time to prepare.
The organization said they would have liked to see the state upgrade its program and reinstate the certification programs it cut in 2021.
“Our vision includes advocating for increased state resources and technical support tailored for organic growers, particularly those contemplating a transition to organic practices,” the organization said. “Investing in organic farming will, in the long run, create more economic opportunity and resilience for NH farmers.”

Fourteen other states have their own certification programs, while the majority of accredited agents are not affiliated with state governments.

Organic farmers in New Hampshire must apply to a new agent by April 27. Getting certified by a new agent can take up to 6 months, and that process requires farmers to complete new Organic System Plans. Many farms just submitted versions of those to the New Hampshire Department of Agriculture, Markets and Food for their March 1 deadline, before the announcement that the program would end.

Guidance for switching prepared by NOFA-NH can be found here. The USDA offers a cost-sharing program that can cover up to $750 in organic certification costs.
The Organic Trade Association (OTA) is thrilled to announce the new leadership team of co-CEOs Tom Chapman and Matthew Dillon. Reflecting the expanding vision of the trade association and the increasing opportunities and potential in the organic sector, Chapman and Dillon will combine their deep sets of expertise and seasoned perspectives to continue to push organic forward.  

“Tom and Matthew are truly a dynamic duo with a history of success as well as partnership, and they are poised and eager to accelerate the work of the trade association and to help us reach our strategic objectives,” said Tracy Favre, President of OTA’s Board of Directors. “Moving to co-CEOs broadens OTA's ability to effectively represent our members in the growing and evolving organic sector.  The timing is right for this change, and the entire Board of Directors is supportive of this evolution in our leadership."  

Chapman and Dillon bring an impressive depth and breadth of leadership to OTA. Collectively they have more than four decades of experience in organic across the industry, including farming, seed sector, supply chain, consumer packaged goods, certification and regulation and government affairs. With the upcoming announcements of the first USDA Organic Marketing Development grant recipients, the trade association’s continued work as a lead cooperator for USDA’s Transition to Organic Partnership Program, and a Farm Bill worth fighting for, Chapman and Dillon’s leadership will ensure OTA is well positioned to support the continued growth and improvement of the organic sector. 

Chapman joined the trade association in April 2022 as CEO, bringing 20 years of industry experience with expertise in policy, organic certification and organic supply chains. Starting his career at Quality Assurance International, he went on to lead the management of supply chains at Kinder’s Premium Sauces and Seasonings, Clif Bar & Company and Numi Organic Tea. As OTA’s co-CEO, Chapman will lead the association’s regulatory and technical affairs work, oversee the development of association programs and products and will be responsible for operations and financial management. 

Dillon was raised in an agricultural family and community in Nebraska and has held diverse roles in organic food and farming, working from seed to shelf. He headed Abundant Life Seed, one of the first certified seed companies in the U.S. and founded Organic Seed Alliance. He worked for over ten years at Clif Bar & Company in several roles including Vice President of Impact and Government Affairs. He most recently served as Chief Sustainability Officer for organic poultry producer Farmer Focus. As co-CEO for OTA, Dillon will oversee the organization’s public relations, policy agenda, member engagement and fundraising.   

“It's a privilege to co-lead OTA with Matt Dillion, particularly at this pivotal moment for the organic. Our collective dedication to advancing the organic marketplace and our deep-rooted trade experience position us well to drive the organic sector forward. I look forward to leveraging our expertise to elevate OTA's initiatives, foster growth in the marketplace, and champion the benefits of organic for a healthier, more sustainable future,” said Chapman.  

“I’m thrilled to be stepping into this role. There’s an incredible opportunity to improve the integrity, relevance, and value of organic for our farmers, brands, consumers, and planet. OTA can continue to lead and convene its diverse members to expand that potential. I look forward to working with Tom, the rest of the staff, our members, and the broader community of organizations working to improve the future of food and farming,” said Dillon. 

More people than ever are eating organic food and using organic products, and the U.S. organic sector has never been bigger. Organic sales in the U.S. in 2022 totaled a record $67.6 billion, as consumers are increasingly attracted to organic because of its environmental, nutritional and social benefits. Organic food sales, at almost $62 billion, broke through $60 billion for the first time, hitting another high-level mark for the robust organic sector.  

As the leading voice for organic trade in the United States, OTA has worked to strengthen organic businesses and promote organic agriculture for 30 years. The association represents more than 10,000 organic businesses across 50 states. Its members represent the entire organic supply chain, including growers, shippers, processors, certifiers, farmers' associations, distributors, importers, exporters, consultants, retailers and others. 

The association’s expanding activities reflect the forward momentum and growth of the organic sector: its increasingly strong and effective advocacy for organic on Capitol Hill and in government agencies, the building out of business services offered to members, the creation of new member councils and task forces to better represent emerging organic categories, the inclusion of organic in climate-smart discussions and solutions, and the trade association’s growing diversity and entrepreneurship program.   
“We all know the benefits of organic, but it’s time to reinvigorate that conversation with consumers, farmers, business leaders, policymakers, and advocates working to improve the food system for people and the planet. I am confident that Tom and Matthew working together at the trade association’s helm will enable OTA to best support its members and ensure the continued growth of organic,” said Favre.   
About the Organic Trade Association
The Organic Trade Association (OTA) is the membership-based business association for organic agriculture and products in North America. OTA is the leading voice for the organic trade in the United States, representing over 10,000 organic businesses across 50 states. Its members include growers, shippers, processors, certifiers, farmers' associations, distributors, importers, exporters, consultants, retailers and others. OTA's Board of Directors is democratically elected by its members. OTA's mission is to promote and protect ORGANIC with a unifying voice that serves and engages its diverse members from farm to marketplace.

Uganda showcases its global organic agriculture credentials
As the country hosts two big global meetings, Uganda has highlighted its credentials in organic agriculture and its resultant food safety.
The meetings are the ongoing 120-member state 19th Non-Aligned Movement Summit which started on January 15 and will end on January 20, 2024 while the third 134-member state South [aka G77+China] Summit will commence on January 21 to 24.
Addressing a joint media conference at the Office of the Prime Minister recently, officials from the ministry of Agriculture, Animal Industry and Fisheries (MAAIF) and the National Organic Agricultural Movement of Uganda (NAGOMU) repeatedly said Uganda has the second-highest number of organic farmers in the world, after India.
Bob George Sunday, senior agricultural officer, Food Security and focal person, Organic Agriculture at MAAIF; and Chariton Namuwoza, the CEO of NOGAMU and president, African Organic Network, said between 2018 and 2021, Uganda registered a 91 per cent increase in number of certified organic farmers to 404,000; certification started in 1993.
Their statement defined organic farming as, “the production of food without the use of synthetic and harmful chemicals such as pesticides, fertilisers, livestock feed additives or genetically modified components. [It] relies on alternative farming methods including crop rotation, mechanical cultivation, use of animal and green manure, and integrated pest management”.
Namuwoza said scientists at Makerere University in collaboration with NOGAMU and other civil society organisations developed Kebera, a simple soil and foods tool for testing organic content which can be used by smallholder farmers and consumers, soon to be commercialised.
“This device will reduce transactional costs associated with third-party organic certification, as well as increasing trust among consumers of organic products that what they eat is truly organic,” the statement said.
Sunday said Uganda is one of few countries in Africa with a national organic agriculture policy (2019) and is now working on a national organic agriculture bill.
BENEFITS OF ORGANICS
The statement said organic agriculture and agroecology support national food security through increased yields and incomes, consistent production, guaranteeing soil fertility improvement over the long term, conserving and improving topsoil by enriching microbiological diversity and reducing erosion, water conservation, and control of pests and diseases.
Agroecology and organics benefit the environment, and can counter climate change. It reduces greenhouse gasses, improves soil carbon sequestration, increases resilience and contributes to better health.
The statement added that conversion to organic farming in subsistence agriculture can lead to 180 per cent increase in yields. In 2021, Uganda’s organic food exports stood at $174 million, accounting for 12 per cent of total agricultural exports.
MAAIF and NOGAMU officials called upon Uganda’s private sector to feed the expected guests on safe organic foods, pointing out that Hotel African had already committed to serve only organic foods to the 300 delegates it will be hosting.
They also appealed to the media to publicise the health, economic and ecological benefits of organic farming, and Uganda’s exemplary performance in that area.

Farmers Urged To Adopt Organic Agriculture To Maximize Yield
Farmers have been encouraged to embrace organic farming system to realize maximum yields from their small holder acreages to promote biodiversity and sustaining the fertility of the soil.

Sam Nderitu, the founder of Global Intensive Agriculture Centre of Kenya (G-BIACK) an organisation based in Kiambu  County and has been instrumental in training smallholder farmers in agro ecology farming says organic farming practices ensured that the soil fertility was maintained and enriched since most of the input applied were biodegradable.

He said through such trainings G-BIACK had equipped small holder farmers with the skills to fully exploit the potentials of their farms in wider goal of reducing poverty levels as well as improving food security and their general standard of living.

“Global intensive is an organisation based in Kiambu that trains and encourages small holder farmers with one to five acres of land to practice to embrace agroecology to increase their production”, he told Kenya News Agency during an interview.

Noting that going organic was the most sustainable way of farming because it entailed use of resources that the farmers could easily access, Nderitu said the concept offered healthy and safe food and played a role in mitigating against the effects of climate change because pesticides and other inputs with residual effects to the environment were not applied.

“Some of the chemicals used as farm inputs pose grave risk to the eco system as they produces carbon into the atmosphere thereby worsening volumes of toxic emissions to the environment and at the same time expose consumers of such produce to disease such as cancer” he said.

He explained that going organic means using what they call a closed loop system where all the food produced can also be recycled.  “For example, if a farmer produces maize and beans and other crops, the waste of these crops is supposed to return to the same soil”, he said

He added that  the farmers could also use animal waste to produce compost manure which  has more carbon materials and nitrogen so a farmer doesn’t need to pump in a lot of nitrogen to the soil.

“An 1/8 of an acre according to the research that we have carried out is able to feed one person throughout the year and the farmer will be able to produce the food and at the same time derive some income from the same parcel if well utilized”, he said

He however said going organic was a process that could take up to six years for the farmers to fully transition from conventional to organic farming to realize maximum benefits from the concept.

He stressed that it entails taking one step at a time because one will have to use a lot of organic matter to clean the residual effects of chemical fertilizers deposited in the soil saying the soil in the country was too acidic owing to the decline in production.

“I am not saying that soil that has higher acidity levels is totally bad because there are some crops that do well under such conditions but a majority of crops under the ideal situation thrive in soil whose PH value is 4.0 and below. He said

Nderitu decried that the country was gradually turning into a net importer of food stuff that were once available in abundance because the soil for agriculture production was rendered infertile due to excessive use of chemical over a period of time.

He said it time farmers were empowered to focus on soil fertility management by testing the deficiencies in the soil before recommending the missing ingredients and possible remedies to improve the fertility and the right crop to be grown in a particular area.

“Any cured manure, he explained, has the elements that are needed by the plant, because one feeds the soil and the soil feeds the plant as opposed to applying chemical fertilizers in the soil which feeds the plant and destroys the soil” Nderitu said.

“Kenyans have to wake up and think about the soil, because when talking about the soil, you are also talking about the generations to come. What kind of a generation do you want? Do you want a generation that’s borrowing food from other countries? We need to think about growing our own food. Kenya should grow and eat the food that Kenyans grow” he posed.

Nderitu said as the 2023 Conference of the Parties of the UNFCCC, more commonly referred to as COP 28 nears, it will be of no importance if the meeting does not discuss matters Agro ecology and supporting of farmers to go organic.

The 28th United Nations Climate Change conference to be starts from 30th November until 12th December 2023, at the Expo City, Dubai.

Emmanuel Atamba. the founder and CEO of APSID Consulting, a firm that provides consultancy services in food and farming systems in Kenya said the most it was critical for the country to open candid conversation on agro ecology  to transform the food systems

He expressed fears that the country was still grappling with food security challenges despite spending millions of resources and initiatives to address the ever elusive struggle to secure a meal for each and every person in the world.

He explained that according to FAO, still more than 750 million people globally were food insecure and this is a clear indicator that conversation for alternative approach to the problem was required to turn around the trend.

“Agro ecology for me is a paradigm shift where we are looking at how we reinvent our agricultural activities so that we align ourselves with nature rather than working against nature.

Today, Atamba said the government was fixated with lowering the cost of fertilizer and despite offering subsidies to make it affordable only pockets of farmers could meet the costs hence there is need to review the approach and focus on agro-ecology and enable farmers have access to quality seeds that are productive, viable and climate resilient te realize the desired yields
“Matters of going organic he added is about farmers, producers and the whole value chain that is geared towards getting nutritious diverse foods, about changing the way we perceive food and changing the way we perceive agriculture not only as a victim of climate change but a potential solution to the climate crisis”, he said
He added that we need to redesign our food production systems to take into account the current context of the climate crisis and the solution is recognizing farmers, producers as managers of landscapes and supporting them.
“Going organic is a timely conversation especially now that all of us are worried whether we are going to have a meal 10 years from now or not. This is the time to ask ourselves why are we worried, why are we scared. Because basically we are standing on shaky ground. We are standing upon a system that is not sustainable, that is not resilient, that cannot see us through the next few generations as humans”, Atamba said.

He said transitioning to agro ecology should not be left to farmers alone as it requires adapting to climate change and this will require resources. Government, he said, needs to ensure that they are supporting the farmers for them to adapt through various investments, advocacy, and politically directing the right amount of resources in agro ecology.

“We can accelerate through providing information, providing knowledge, things like what, for example, the G-BIACK Center is doing, of training farmers and exposing farmers to alternative ways of thinking and looking at food systems,” Atamba said

He however said that it is important that the consumers also be part of the conversation and that they should learn to choose food not because it’s cheaper, but because it is better for them, the environment and also of benefit

Atamba reiterated Nderitu’s sentiments saying that the upcoming COP 28 meeting discussions will be key because they are guiding the global thinking around addressing the climate crisis and food systems or agriculture are not only affected by climate change but are also a potential avenue for solutions and interventions towards the climate crisis.

8 Healthy Cheerios Alternatives to Switch to and Ditch the Glyphosate
Healthy Cheerios alternatives? Oh yeah, that’s a thing. Read on to learn the potential health risks of glyphosate and a scary new pesticide, chlormequat. But no worries, we offer eight great organic cereals to eat instead.
General Mills claims that Cheerios are not produced with genetically modified ingredients, as stated on the label, but that raised eyebrows in recent years when it was discovered that Cheerios were contaminated with glyphosate. This, btw, is surprising because GMOs are genetically engineered to be resistant to glyphosate, aka, farmers can target weeds while leaving the resistant crops unaffected. Thus, why the need for glyphosate? 
What the Heck is Glyphosate?
In addition to being found in weed killers, glyphosate is also the active ingredient in the popular Monsanto herbicide Roundup.1 Cause for concern? Absolutely. Glyphosate is most often used with GMO crops. It’s not something we should worry about when looking for healthy cereal options to feed our families.

(Psst…it’s not just General Mills. Glyphosate was found in several popular processed foods when undergoing testing by Food Democracy Now!)

The Health Risks of Glyphosate in Your Food
Glyphosate is an undesirable ingredient to find in cereal for a number of reasons. First, glyphosate was found to be a "probable human carcinogen" by the World Health Organization back in 2015, and has been linked to cancer — not really something you want floating around in your kids' breakfast bowls.2

According to the Environmental Working Group (EWG), new human studies suggest that exposure to this chemical during pregnancy may be associated with risks such as lower birth weight, shorter pregnancy, and found children exposed to glyphosate are at higher risks for metabolic and liver disease.2

The Environmental Risks of Glyphosate
Glyphosate also has some equally scary effects on the environment. It has been linked to pollinator death, including population decline amongst Monarch butterflies. Not to mention harm to the spatial learning and memory of honeybees, impairing their ability to pollinate plants and find food sources.

When you choose GMO-free foods for your family, you're not supposed to have to worry about glyphosate: after all, GMO-free foods are not "Roundup ready" and don't resist glyphosate.

However, Monsanto has encouraged farmers to spray glyphosate on certain crops, including oats — the main ingredient in Cheerios and many breakfast cereals — in order to dry them down before processing.

In other words, your favorite breakfast cereals may be GMO-free and still contain glyphosate.

Do you want the good news first, or the bad news?

The Good News
The good news is that in recent years, glyphosate rates have decreased in some convenient snack and breakfast products such as cereals, granola, oatmeal, and snack bars found in many grocery stores.2 This is great news because oats are proven to lower cholesterol levels and support heart health.5 And oat seedlings have been connected with neuroprotective effects, which means oats may support brain health as well!6

 The EWG states “Our latest round of tests showed concentrations of glyphosate above our health benchmark in just under a third of conventional samples.”

This is better, but we aren’t in the clear yet, as glyphosate is still being detected, with the highest amounts found in Quaker products.

The Bad News - There’s a New Pesticide Creeping in Your Food
Now for some bad news– chlormequat, a pesticide found to harm development and reproductive systems in animals, has been creeping into oat-based products. In fact, it was detected in 12 of 13 non-organic lab-tested, oat-based products.3 Out of the 12 detected to have chlormequat, 11 were found to have levels higher than we deem to be safe for children's consumption.

While chlormequat is not approved for food products grown in the US, imported oats are allowed to have residue on them, a regulation permitted by the EPA in 2018. Something to keep in mind while strolling the cereal aisle!

Here’s How We Found Our List of Cereals Without Glyphosate
At Organic Authority, we think cancer-causing chemicals have no place in foods. With this in mind, how are you supposed to find cereal brands that are transparent, sustainable, and healthful?

We took our cue from the Cornucopia Institute, the organic industry watchdog group known for its egg scorecard and work on carrageenan removal from organic products.

The organization has created a similar cereal scorecard, ranking brands based on seven criteria, including the organic status of the brand, GMO policy, and company policy on dangerous chemicals like glyphosate. This helps to cut through misleading marketing and health claims. The top brands in grocery stores have a five-wheat score (and popular cereals and brands like General Mills earn a measly one-wheat rating).

“We can take the law into our own hands and reward the very best companies and protect our family simultaneously,” explains Cornucopia co-founder Mark Kastel.

He recommends choosing only certified organic food to ensure that we don’t get tripped up by nasty GMOs, but there’s more to good food than weeding out the bad.

While you’re at it, you may want to consider further protecting your child by ensuring their gut health, which is proven to support immunity and more. Both fiber-rich foods (prebiotics), like organic cereals, and probiotics may help (read more on probiotics for kids here).

“We are trying to differentiate between the true heroes in this industry, complying with the spirit and the letter of the law, and major brands we consider ‘scofflaws,’” explains Kastel.

With that in mind, here are just a few cereal brands you can really trust.

Here are 8 Healthy Cereal Alternatives to Cheerios 
Cold Cereals
1. Nature's Path
Nature's Path

Nature's Path gets a five-wheat rating from the Cornucopia Institute thanks to its long-time commitment to organic foods.

"Our goal is to be a trusted name for quality organic foods in every home - socially responsible, environmentally sustainable and financially viable," the company notes on its website.

They are USDA certified organic, certified gluten free, and everything is produced and grown using non-chemical agriculture. And did we mention, they’re delicious?

This company's line of cold breakfast cereals truly offers something for everyone, with more than 50 varieties. The Q'ia line of flakes is made with sprouted grains and add-ins like fair trade cocoa powder or chia seeds. Crispy rice and corn flakes, will remind you of classic popular cereal favorites (without the pesky herbicides).

The Envirokidz line is delicious and makes an impact. With every purchase, Nature’s Path donates 1% of the proceeds to environmental education and conservation projects that help save endangered animals. So, while your kids (and you!) munch on a delicious healthy alternative to most store bought cereals marketed to kids, you might be saving animals in need!

 2. Cascadian Farm
While this organic brand is owned by General Mills, the producer of Cheerios, Cascadian Farm's organic cereals are a horse of a different color entirely, and they're definitely a better choice than many other brands. What's more, since they're owned by a bigger company, they tend to be fairly easy to find.

Cascadian Farm makes a number of whole grain cereals you can feel good about feeding your kids, including gluten-free Berry Vanilla Puffs that avoid the technicolor hues of some other kids' cereal, and Cinnamon Crunch, Honey Nut O’s (the perfect alternative to Honey Nut Cheerios), and Raisin Bran to rival even the most popular breakfast cereal brands. If you think you'll miss plain Cheerios, try their Purely O's -- we love that the first ingredient is organic whole grain oats.

100% of this brand’s cereal is USDA certified organic, and they’re given 100 points (out of 100) on Cornucopia for their brand’s GMO policy.

As much as we love classic cereals like Fruit Loops (c’mon, I’m sure you remember how good a bowl of those neon-fruit-rings were on a Saturday morning), we don’t love all the additives. Made from whole grain yellow corn meal, Fruitful O’s keep breakfast fun while ditching artificial colors and flavors. 


3. Annie's Homegrown


We’ve been long-time fans of Annie’s after falling in love with their delicious, organic mac and cheese products. And, we are happy to announce that their packaged cereals live up to their tasty legacy!

Cocoa Bunnies are perfect for those who like a bit of chocolate first thing in the morning, and since they contain 13 grams of whole grains and fair trade cocoa, you can feel good about serving them to your little ones.

Berry Bunnies' fun shapes and natural color are much more palatable than technicolor fruit cereals that you may have grown up with (seriously, there’s no way something that bright can be good for you). Their delicious Cinnamon Roll Cereal is naturally gluten-free, and, as it says on their box, made with goodness (which to us, means organic, non-GMO ingredients). 


Granolas and Clusters
4. Go Raw - Gluten Free Granola and More

Trying to break up with added sugar? Try Go Raw. As its name suggests, is a raw food company offering bars, cookies, crisps, and a gluten-free granola in four flavors: Apple Cinnamon, Raisin Crunch, Super Simple, and Coco Crunch. The use of sprouted seeds offers a crunchy alternative to milled grain cereals.

“We want to offer consumers more 'free-from' options that don’t sacrifice on flavor,” writes rep Lindsay Lea. “Our customers can feel confident that they are eating a granola that is not filled with junk just to make it ‘taste’ good.”

Their Certified Gluten-Free, 0g-added sugar per serving, and nut-free apple cinnamon flavor is like a blast of fall that you can enjoy all year round. The first ingredient listed is dates (which is a much better option than brown rice syrup or cane sugar), giving it an unbeatable, naturally sweet flavor, and with just 11 ingredients — it's a whole foods breakfast you can feel good about. Their gluten-free Coco Crunch is another favorite.

With ingredients sourced domestically when possible to ensure adherence to strict organic guidelines and an open-door policy when consumers have questions about a specific ingredient, Go Raw offers transparency, assured quality, and a delicious healthy cereal.

5. Grandy Organics

Grandy Organics is a granola, trail mix, and hot cereal company founded on “hippie heritage” and friendship. The co-owners of the company began working together in April of 2000 after bonding over being the only two guys in their college class that drove VW buses.

Today, the folks behind Grandy Organics call themselves "real granolas," both for their real food cereal, made without preservatives and refined added sugars (like cane sugar), and their "crunchy granola" mindset.

The company produces a wide range of granolas and healthy cereal options, including a grain-free granola made with organic nuts, providing healthy fats, coconut flakes, and seeds that’s paleo-friendly, and ever since 2015, these products have been made in a net-zero bakery — the first in the country — operated in a 100 percent solar-powered facility, which is a huge deal.

Despite their super clean, "granola" principles, the founders still don't want to put down the competition, even if their cereals and products are less healthful than Grandy Organics.

“We choose to stay positive and focus on our ethos," says Chief Granola Officer Aaron Anker." So a few years ago, we came up with ‘Granola Wisdoms.’”

These include “You don’t have to be related to have a family business,” and “Ripped jeans are cool. Spliced genes are not.” They're great ways to make choosing healthy cereal even more fun.

Their Classic granola recipe, made with pumpkin seeds, walnuts, cashews, and lightly sweetened with wildflower honey, has been the same recipe since 1979 (because when something is that perfect, why bother changing it?). And if you're concerned about the sugar content, Grandy Organics is a much healthier version of the leading granola with 50% less sugar per serving.

But they don’t stop there, Grandy Organics offers a honey-nut granola with whole grains (much better than Honey Nut Cheerios), made with gluten free oats, as well as a grain-free “coconola”, their coconut-based organic granola loaded with pecans, cashews, seeds, and coconut chips. 
6. Pure Bliss Organics

Jon Morgan and Antonio Da Costa first got into the granola business in 2005, and ever since, they’ve been creating a healthy cereal that jives with their love of people, Bhakti yoga, and the planet.

Pure Bliss produces organic granola (and delicious granola bars for on-the-go use) using sustainable ingredients and quality products.

“From our vendors to our staff, including our cooks who prepare our products, and to [the consumer] — everything we do is done with good intention," they say. “We use minimally processed certified organic ingredients, with NO FUNNY STUFF added.”

Their granola options include plant protein-packed cashew butter granola, four flavors sweetened with coconut sugar, and even gluten-free options.

Their French Almond Vanilla flavor, affectionately named “my fav,” packs a sweet and healthy punch in the morning. Made with simple, organic, non-GMO ingredients (ingredients you can actually pronounce, unlike a lot of granolas on the market), this granola pairs perfectly with your morning coffee and a heaping spoonful of organic Greek yogurt (or just pour milk right on top, if that’s your thing)!

7. Farm to Table Foods
Farm to Table is an organic oatmeal producer creating healthy cereal blends that do away with excessive processing and highlight the natural goodness in the grains.
This company's story begins with a family: Martin Canellakis’ four-year-old daughter had become quite picky, as four-year-olds often are, and, he recalls, “One of the few things I could get her to eat was oatmeal.”
“I noticed that it was very difficult to get my hands on anything but either regular rolled oats or steel-cut oats, and if by chance there was a blend of grains available, it was usually a random blend with no consideration for flavor or texture,” he says. “Also, since organic is the price of entry in our house, my options were even more limited. So I started experimenting.”
Since he created those first healthy cereal blends at home, Farm to Table has grown in leaps and bounds. Today, it sells several blends including an ancient grain blend of spelt, Kamut, barley, rye, and flax seeds, some of which are served at Mercer Kitchen, Casa Lever, and even the Waldorf Astoria.
While this company has seen considerable success, Canellakis does everything he can to keep the small-batch feeling of the company in tact, and that means working closely with farmers (and even profiling them on the company website.)
“Ensuring quality is all about starting at the right source," he says, and for Farm to Table, that begins with the farmer.
“We only deal with people we know and trust,” he says. “This has been a hindrance to our growth, but we’re also not so sure that bigger is better.”
Farm to Table’s Ancient Super Grain is seriously something to write home about. Having roots in Mesopotamia, Ancient Grain has never been hybridized or modified to conform to modern agricultural methods.
8. Great River Organic Milling, Multi-Grain Cereal
Great River Organic Milling is, as its name suggests, a milling company selling flours (including whole grain wheat flour), whole grains, pancake mixes, and a line of four hot cereals, ranging from the highland medley featuring whole grain oats, barley, and rice, to the multi-grain mix, a blend of wheat, brown rice, corn, rye, millet, and barley.
The company takes pride in the relationships that it has developed with its farmers, about 90 percent of whom are based in the northern plains of the United States.
“We try to work whenever possible directly with the farmers,” explains rep Craig Adams. “We’re a small company ourselves, so we really like to have those relationships and have the kind of supply chain that's secure, and you can be on first-name terms.”
As the company grows, it remains committed to maintaining these relationships and avoiding going through grain brokers at all costs. This ensures that the company can continue to provide the kind of transparency it prides itself on.
Great River is always willing to go the extra mile, whether that means certifying its organic corn with the non-GMO Project as well, or answering a customer question about who farmed the rolled oats in her oatmeal.
“That's how this business was founded in 1975, that's the model that they established then. And the owner that bought this business back in 2003 has continued with that ethos and ethics, so that's simply what we want to continue with,” explains Adams.

You can literally taste the love and care that goes into making this breakfast, and the pride Great River Organic Milling takes in their products. This multigrain mix is all organic and all you need to start your day off right.
In the United States, acceptable levels of trace toxins and chemicals, including glyphosate, are set by the EPA, with influence from a number of legislative bodies, including the U.S. House Committee on Agriculture and the Senate Agriculture Committee.
Other congressional committees, such as the US House Committee on Oversight and Government Reform and the U.S. House of Representatives Committee on Science, Space and Technology have recently begun examining some of the more high-profile elements of these decisions within the EPA.
Lobby groups such as the Glyphosate Task Force, which unites Monsanto, Dow Agrosciences, Syngenta, and Barclay Chemicals, the Big Food Lobby, and trade association CropLife America put enormous pressure on government bodies to regulate in favor of large agrochemical groups, thus making it even more difficult to source healthful foods for your family.
10% organic food target in new ‘Green’ public procurement
The government has approved a new Green Public Procurement (GPP) Strategy that mandates that 10% of the value of food purchased via public procurement must be accounted for by produce that is certified organic.

The strategy covers a wide range of sectors apart from agriculture, and is regarded by the government as a policy lever in achieving environmental objectives, as the state’s large purchasing power gives it significant influence in providing environmentally friendlier products.

The strategy will also use seasonality of food products as a part of the criteria in public sector food procurement.
The food categories to which the 10% organic rule will apply are cereals, fresh beef, lamb, pork, poultry, fish, vegetables, and dairy produce.
The new strategy, which comes with an action plan for its implementation, replaces the current system of ‘green tenders’.
The GPP Strategy has been welcomed by Minister of State for land use and biodiversity Pippa Hackett, who said “We have seen a threefold increase in both the number of organic farmers and in the area of land farmed organically.
“From now on, 10% of the value of food sought by public sector bodies under new contract arrangements is to be certified organic. We want to support a diverse organic sector, so I felt it particularly important for the strategy to provide that the 10% number should be across individual food categories, rather than the entire target being met through supplies of only one or two food categories,” she added.
The minister said the new strategy will help the state reach its target of having 10% of agricultural land in the country farmed organically by 2030.
“One of the ways we can support even more farmers to make the switch to organic is for the state to become a purchaser of organic food, and we know that public procurement has worked really well in other EU member states.”
Commenting on the seasonality factor, Minister Hackett said: “There will be times of the year that we can provide organic food much more readily, and in much greater supply, and those periods might well see much more than 10% organic food being used.
“Equally, there will of course be months when supply may be a bit lower. The key will be to hit the 10% target figure across the course of the year, and I am really looking forward to seeing our state agencies and government departments contribute to that objective,” she added.

Much has changed in the US organic food and beverage sector since the US Department of Agriculture National Organic Program (NOP) was established in 2000. And 2024 will bring more changes, everything from stricter regulations to a growing demand for imports.

To ensure organic remains a reliable certification for shoppers, NOP issued its Strengthening Organic Enforcement (SOE) rule that went into effect on March 20, 2023. Operations and certifiers must fully comply with the rule by March 19, 2024.

The SOE closes loopholes that had enabled ingredients that do not meet NOP standards to enter the organic supply chain, leading to fraud. Key updates include requiring certification of more of the businesses at critical links in organic supply chains.

Previously, only operations involved in producing, processing, packaging and labeling organic products required certification. The SOE requires buyers, sellers, brokers and traders to be certified.

“The USDA estimated 4,000 to 5,000 companies would need new certification,” said Nate Ensrud, vice president – US technical services, certification and food safety solutions, FoodChain ID, Fairfield, Iowa. “Many organizations think they are exempt when they are not. It’s the middle layer of the supply chain that is of primary concern.

“Over the last three months, the net change in USDA NOP certified organic operations in the US was essentially zero. A non-compliant company not only affects its own business but others in the organic supply chain. Based on the USDA NOP data, I believe non-compliance is going to happen and be disruptive.”

Another potential disruption is with imports. The situation will look far different than the backlog of cargo ships at ports that occurred during the pandemic. Non-compliant imports will be returned to their country of origin or have to be sold as conventional product, suggesting there’s a chance organic supply will not meet organic demand.

That’s because the SOE requires organic certificates for all organic imports, along with recordkeeping and traceability through the Organic Integrity Database. With many of the most-sought organic ingredients being imports, this has been a tedious task, but the industry believes the result will be worth it.

“The goal is to protect organic integrity and bolster consumer confidence in the USDA organic seal,” said Jennifer Tucker, deputy administrator for USDA NOP.

Maintaining the integrity of the program, in turn, should fuel continued growth of organic foods and beverages, a sector that peaked at $61.7 billion in sales in the United States in 2022, according to the Organic Trade Association, Washington. Inflation raised costs across the entire food supply chain and boosted prices in the grocery aisles; thus, similar to overall food and beverage sales, the value of organic sales grew even as the growth in the volume of sales for some categories slipped.

“Organic has proven it can withstand short-term economic storms,” said Tom Chapman, chief executive officer of the OTA. “Despite the fluctuation of any given moment, Americans are still investing in their personal health, and, with increasing interest, in the environment, organic is the answer.

“Organic is at that right intersection of environmental and personal health. Organic brings together the interest in human health and a healthy environment, and that offers organic a positive pathway forward and will help organic businesses withstand challenges in the future.”

The most sought organic ingredients
Inflation has forced many organic shoppers to be selective. Conventional bananas and oranges, for example, with their protective skins, may be deemed acceptable by the organic shopper on a budget, but fresh berries and tomatoes, not so much.

Meanwhile, certain ingredients are sought by organic shoppers because their sourcing resonates with the shopper’s personal values. One is cocoa and the chocolate made from it.

That’s because the conventional cocoa industry has a dark side, which includes environmental impacts of how it is grown, harvested and processed, along with the use of child labor and the low wages paid to workers. Consumers perceive organic chocolate to be natural, healthier and better quality than non-organic chocolate, according to research from Cargill, Minneapolis, and is fueling growth of organic chocolate.

The global organic cocoa market was valued at $8.3 billion in 2022 and is projected to grow at a compound annual growth rate of 3.3% to reach a value of $11.5 billion by 2032, according to Future Market Insights, Valley Cottage, NY. While it is growing, the market for organic cocoa is only about 0.5% of global cocoa production.

“Consumers have learned about these issues and are now seeking products that align with their values,” said Aaron Iverson, national sales manager, Global Organics, Cambridge, Mass. “They understand that organic cocoa is grown in a more sustainable way without the use of synthetic additives. This resonates with health-conscious consumers.”

Research from Barry Callebaut, Zurich, shows consumers are becoming more environmentally conscious and looking for chocolate produced in a way that is perceived as sustainable and ethical. Almost 7 out of 10 consumers prefer chocolate brands and products that enable them to do good for people and the planet, according to Barry Callebaut. Organic certification supports such efforts.

“Organic” means the chocolate was produced using only organic methods and contains a minimum of 95% organic ingredients. For some marketers and consumers that’s enough. Others want more.

Agostoni, a chocolate brand from Icam SpA, Italy, produces 100% organic chocolate made with all organic-certified ingredients, which include the cocoa liquor, cane sugar, cocoa butter, vanilla extract and soy lecithin. Icam controls the entire production chain, from the plantation to the finished product. The traceable powders, chips, chunks and other formats are produced following an ethical and sustainable approach.

Dr. Bronner’s, Vista, Calif., now offers regenerative organic certified salted dark chocolate. The confection is made with a blend of regenerative organic certified ingredients, including cocoa from Ghana and Ivory Coast, cocoa butter from Congo, bourbon vanilla from Madagascar and coconut sugar from Indonesia.

Organic plant-based proteins are another growing category, said Iverson. And all plant-based proteins are available with organic certification.

“The future of plant based is with clean and simple ingredients,” Iverson said. “Organic certification gets you there.”

Iverson added, “And everything coconut is booming, the milk, the cream, the sugar, the nectar, even the aminos. Coconut aminos are similar to soy sauce, with an umami, savory profile, with a hint of sweetness but no coconut flavor.”

Coconut aminos are derived from the fermented sap of a coconut palm tree and sea salt. They may directly replace soy sauce in a formulation and the organic-certified labeling offers a better-for-you proposition.

Organic sugars such as coconut sugar also are popular. In the better-for-you consumer’s mind, organic sugars provide permission to consume at a time when some view sugar negatively.

Approximately three out of four consumers try to limit or avoid sugars to improve their diet in general, according to the 2023 Food and Health Survey from International Food Information Council, Washington. Still, sugar remains the preferred sweetener choice over low- and no-calorie sweeteners. Enter organic.

Organic cane sugar, the most common, comes in forms such as brown, confectioners, turbinado and white. Brazil-based Natíve, one of the largest global producers of organic cane sugar, is adding value to its product portfolio with a new regenerative organic certified cane sugar.

The certification was made possible because of the company’s Green Cane Project. It focuses on soil health and biodiversity and integrates sustainability at all levels of the operation, according to the company. Green cane harvesting is accomplished by using mechanical harvesters to separate the sugar cane leaves and tops from the sugar-bearing stalk. The process replaces the destructive practice of burning sugar cane fields.

While organic cane sugar is trending in new product development, it’s organic coconut sugar that is garnering the attention of food formulators. It is a natural sugar made from coconut palm sap, which is the sugary circulating fluid of the coconut plant. It is not palm sugar, which is similar but made from a different type of palm tree.

Coconut sugar is made through a two-step process that is simple and appeals to the better-for-you consumer. A cut is made on the flower of the coconut palm. The liquid sap is then collected into containers and heated until most of the water has evaporated. The end product is brown and resembles granulated raw cane sugar.

Coconut sugar’s claim to fame is that it retains some of the minerals and phytonutrients found in the palm tree. And while it contains the same four calories per gram as other sugars, it has been shown to have a lower glycemic index.

When it comes to finished products being developed with organic ingredients, baby and toddler foods are big. Serenity Kids, Austin, Texas, a marketer of shelf-stable baby and toddler foods is rolling out World Explorer Pouches, which offer an international twist to standard baby food, according to the company. The meat-based line provides a culinary adventure honoring dishes from around the world, including Argentina, Japan, India, the Mediterranean, Mexico and Thailand. The World Explorers line is formulated with regeneratively farmed meats and organic vegetables, herbs and spices. Varieties include free-range chicken coconut curry, grass-fed beef chimichurri and wild-caught salmon teriyaki.

The regenerative angle
Across all organic ingredients and whole foods, the topic of sustainability has entered the conversation, as sourcing ingredients farmed in a manner that considers environmental and social impacts is a way to further differentiate organic foods to shoppers. Enter regenerative organic certification.

To be certified regenerative organic, farmers must demonstrate their farming practices take soil health and animal welfare into consideration and that farm workers are treated fairly. The farming practices have been shown to improve crop yields, reduce pests and increase biodiversity.

“We’re confident that a growing number of households want to select regenerative organic products for their personal and family health but also for the long-term sustainability of our planet,” said Ted Robb, co-founder, New Barn Organics, Fullerton, Calif., which now offers regenerative organic certified almond milk and pasture-raised eggs.

Chicago-based SPINS attributes the growing appeal to regenerative organic to the fact shoppers’ preferences have become more values driven. For the 52 weeks ended Nov. 5, 2023, unit sales of products labeled organic were down 4% across combined natural and conventional channels, while unit sales of products sporting regenerative organic certification were up 39%.

SPINS also said “as the dairy industry has long battled with the image of being bad for the environment, we see products that are certified regenerative organic buck the trend. Consumers are willing to pay more for dairy products that have the regenerative organic certification.”

Regenerative organic certified dairy ingredients are helping brands differentiate. Cheddies, Austin, Texas, partnered with Alexandre Family Farms, Crescent City, Calif., to create a formulation in which one serving of the cheese crackers provide 6 grams of protein.

Once Upon a Farm, Berkeley, Calif., also is working with Alexandre Family Farms and has launched no-sugar-added organic A2/A2 Whole Milk Shakes. To further demonstrate the opportunity in organic baby and toddler foods, Once Upon a Farm is adding three new snack items in bar, puff and melts formats.

“Having started with refrigerated, cold-pressed pouches seven years ago, consumer feedback was overwhelming in asking to bring our high standards, clean nutrition and fresh taste to a shelf-stable snack,” said Cassandra Curtis, founder and chief information officer. “We believe all food for babies and toddlers should be packed with wholesome real ingredients, taste great and be convenient for busy parents. Our new snacks deliver on all three fronts, promoting self-feeding and important developmental milestones.”

A Generational Commitment To Regenerative Organic Farming At Lundberg Family Farms
Founded in 1937 in the northern Sacramento Valley of California, Lundberg Family Farms has been long committed to leaving the land better than they found it and learning from previous generations. The company has taken many important steps on its journey to be 100% Regenerative Organic Certified (ROC) by 2027, and to continue to lead the growing influence in regenerative organic agriculture in the U.S. For instance, they recently announced ROC certification of more than 8,500 acres of rice fields and now offer more than 70 Regenerative Organic Certified products.

As I have written about before, the ROC is an important certification offered by the Regenerative Organic Alliance that was founded by the Rodale Institute, Patagonia, and Dr. Bronner’s. As the name suggests, this certificate not only requires the farming practices to protect the environment, but also to work to rehabilitate it. In addition to its requirements for soil health, ROC also has stringent requirements for animal welfare and the social wellbeing of farmers and workers. ROC farms and products thus must meet holy grail of farm sustainability: soil health, animal welfare, and social fairness.

I recently discussed the Lundberg Family Farms journey with Bryce and Brita Lundberg and they stressed to me that a regenerative food brand starts with stewardship in sustainability practices and that the importance of ROC certification is holding the industry accountable for making meaningful change.

Christopher Marquis: What inspired you to pursue/expand your recent ROC certification? Why is being the leading ROC certified food brand in the U.S. is so important to Lundberg Family Farms?

Bryce Lundberg: When my grandparents moved to California in the wake of the Dust Bowl, they brought with them a new philosophy: Leave the land better than you found it. That’s what led us to start farming organically in the 1960s and become Regenerative Organic Certified® in 2023. We exist to grow the highest quality rice using organic and regenerative farming practices because we believe the health of our bodies and our planet depend on it.

Brita Lundberg: In California, we’re experiencing the impacts of climate change firsthand, from drought to wildfires to atmospheric rivers, and farmers are on the front lines. We have a massive opportunity to positively impact consumers’ plates and the planet by using regenerative organic farming practices that build soil health, support biodiversity, and are more resilient in the face of climate change. Our family is betting the farm on it. By becoming the leading U.S. Regenerative Organic Certified® food brand, we’re proving that it’s possible to implement regenerative organic farming practices at scale.

Marquis: What changes to your previous approach to rice farming did you need to make to become ROC certified? Where there any challenges you needed to overcome?

Bryce: Organic exists on a spectrum, and the USDA National Organic Program sets a floor, but not a ceiling. Our family has always aspired to care for our land and the creatures who call it home. So, while we had to provide additional documentation and data to get Regenerative Organic Certified®, the Regenerative Organic Alliance’s pillars of soil health, animal welfare, and social fairness align with our long-term farming philosophy. We’re grateful that we were able to achieve certification, which validates that our farming practices are consistent with Regenerative Organic Certified standards.

Brita: Usually, when people think about regenerative farming, they imagine cattle, sheep, or chickens. My Great-Grandpa Albert said one of the best things he ever did was leave the livestock in Nebraska. Our family doesn’t own livestock, but we have a relationship with wildlife. Our farms are part of the Pacific Flyway, a major migratory pathway for birds, but the wetlands those birds depend on have been disappearing for decades. So, each winter, we flood a portion of our fields to replicate California’s natural wetlands, providing food and habitat for thousands of ducks, geese, swans, and sandhill cranes who feast on leftover rice, insects, aquatic invertebrates, and weed seeds. Their feet also press rice straw into the soil, which decomposes the rice straw and turns it into mulch for next year’s crop. When the birds fly away, we return water to rivers and streams, where zooplankton from the fields can help nourish salmon.

Marquis: How are farmers, like you, contributing to the debate about industry standards?

Bryce: We believe regenerative starts with organic because we don’t see anything “regenerative” about using harmful chemicals that can be damaging to soil, animals, people, and communities. We also believe definition and third-party certification are essential to build consumer trust and hold the industry accountable for making meaningful change. As an appointee to the State Board of Food and Agriculture, as well as the “Regenerative Agriculture Working Group” formed by California’s Department of Food and Agriculture (CDFA), I’m participating in the process of defining “regenerative agriculture” in California for policies and programs.

Brita: Regenerative systems are often context-specific, and certification should not be treated as one size fits all. Each region and crop will need to implement different standards based on soil type, weather conditions, ecosystem, and crop needs. Food and farming stakeholders across the nation are watching how California defines regenerative. Yes, I hope we pitch a big tent and get farmers on the journey, but I also hope we make “regenerative” meaningful by building on organic farming practices, so change can be meaningful too.

Marquis: How does Lundberg incorporate social and environmental values into its business practices more generally?

Bryce: For us, environmental stewardship starts with the soil—we nourish it so it can nourish us. During the winter, we grow cover crops, which can help sequester carbon, restore nutrients to the soil, reduce weeds, prevent erosion, and provide habitat. We also drown and dry up weeds instead of dousing our fields with chemical herbicides. But our farming practices are only the beginning. At our granary, we use natural methods—instead of chemical fumigants—to keep our rice cool and fresh until it’s milled to order. We have seven on-site solar arrays and have been generating or offsetting 100% of power used at our headquarters since 2004. We also collect, sort, and divert 99.6% of our waste including byproducts like hulls, bran, and broken rice, which we sell as ingredients for pet food, livestock feed, and more. It’s all part of our ambition to leave the land better than we found it.

Brita: Our winter cover crops also provide nesting habitat for ducks. So, when we find duck nests in our fields, we work with our friends at California Waterfowl Association to rescue the eggs by hand and transfer them to a local hatchery to be incubated, hatched, raised, and released back into the wild. Over the years, we’ve rescued an estimated 30,000 duck eggs!

Marquis: What advice do you have for other brands seeking ROC certification?

Bryce: Get started! Reach out to the Regenerative Organic Alliance, start the conversation, and create a roadmap to certification. It doesn’t happen overnight, but we believe it’s worthwhile. Don’t wait.

Brita: Do it! We’re so proud to be part of the regenerative organic community that farms like the world depends on it. But the world is big, and we can’t change it alone. We need the community to keep growing so our impact can grow as well.

Marquis: What’s next for Lundberg?

Bryce: You’ll have to ask the fourth generation. Ha!

Brita: We’ve set a goal to transition all the organic rice we grow to Regenerative Organic Certified® by 2027. As we continue to transition acres to Regenerative Organic Certified®, we’re working with the regenerative organic community to educate retailers and consumers about what regenerative organic means and why it matters. We can’t do this without them. We need people to understand that the true value of food—and, conversely, it’s true cost—goes far beyond the plate to how it impacts the planet. Our hope is that consumers will not only be the change they want to see in the world but eat the change they want to see in the world by finding out where their food comes from, how it was grown, and choosing food that not only tastes good but is also a force of land-restoring, habitat-preserving, community-building wonder. We need people to eat like the world depends on it. Because we believe it does.

USDA recognizes how critical organic agriculture is to our nation’s economy. We also recognize the challenges producers can face transitioning to organic.

Organic production allows producers and processors to hold a unique position in the marketplace and take home a greater share of the food dollar. But before crops can be certified organic, farmers must carefully manage their land without using prohibited inputs like synthetic pesticides for 3 years. During this transition period and the first years after certification, farmers often face many technical and market challenges.

That is why, in 2022, to help build more, new, and better markets and streams of income for farmers and producers, USDA launched the Organic Transition Initiative (OTI). OTI is a $300 million investment that delivers wrap-around technical assistance to producers interested in transitioning to organic. The initiative includes mentoring and advice, direct farmer assistance through conservation financial assistance and targeted organic market development grants.

I recently had the honor of participating in two events in support of OTI. First, I visited Longmont, Colo., to announce the first round of awards through the Organic Market Development Grant program (OMDG). In this first round, $9.75 million was awarded to ten projects which will make great strides in developing and expanding markets for organically grown products nationwide. I look forward to announcing more grant awards through OMDG very soon.

Next, I traveled to Pacific Grove, Calif., for the 44th Annual “EcoFarm” Conference. EcoFarm is the oldest and largest organic farming conference in the West. At EcoFarm, in an interview with Marc Lipson and Berkely Food Institute’s Sakeenah Shabazz, I spoke further about how OTI funding is supporting the organic sector and providing support for all interested farmers, including small and traditionally underserved producers, to transition to organic. We specifically discussed the Transition to Organic Partnership Program (TOPP). TOPP is a farmer-to-farmer mentorship program providing direct farmer training, education, and outreach activities. At the conference I had the chance to meet with TOPP regional leads for the Southwest region and it's amazing to hear how many connections have already been made between producers through this program. We just reached year one of TOPP and there is so much more to come in this five-year program. You can read TOPP success stories from all regions across the country on our website.

Together, these programs help reduce the risk for farmers who want to grow and market organic crops and they expand opportunities for American producers to participate in new markets. With programs like OTI, OMDG and TOPP, it’s an exciting time to be in organic agriculture!

Survey Says: Most Familiar + High Trust = Organic

Organic gets top recognition in grocery aisle, finds Organic Trade Association survey

Washington, D.C. (April 5, 2024) — Consumers recognize the USDA Organic seal more than any other certification in the marketplace, finds a new survey released by the Organic Trade Association (OTA).

Compared to a dozen claims and certifications that can be found on various products in today’s grocery aisles, almost 90 percent of consumers are familiar with organic claims. That deep familiarity with organic carries over into a solid public trust. The USDA Organic seal is trusted by 70 percent of consumers – the most trusted of any agricultural label, and the second-most trusted food label existing, second only to the American Heart Association’s iconic checkmark.
“The results of our survey were incredibly encouraging,” said Tom Chapman, co-CEO of OTA. “As organic has become more accessible to consumers, the benefits of organic have become more widely known, boosting the trust in the organic seal. That’s why our advocacy efforts to honor that trust and to ensure that organic standards keep evolving and strengthening are so critical.”

OTA partnered with Euromonitor International in a survey conducted in December of 2023 of around 1,200 consumers across the country to evaluate what today’s consumers understand about organic, as well as their willingness to pay for USDA Organic products and the individual attributes supported by organic certification.

A look at how organic stacked up against various claims and certifications was also done.  The other food and beverage claims included in the survey were natural, local, grass-fed, raised without antibiotics, vegan, pesticide free, free range, hormone free, humanely raised, allergen free, fair trade and regenerative.

Millennials and Gen Z driving organic and setting the future 

The Millennial and Gen Z generations are today’s biggest organic buyers. Millennials, individuals from 28 to 43 years old in 2024, have been leading the organic charge for close to a decade. Now the young adults of Gen Z (ages 12 to 27) also are making their presence known in the organic market.

Millennials and Gen Z pay more attention to labels than older generations, with over 70 percent of those age groups reporting that the USDA Organic seal matters and is an important consideration when choosing their food. These generations see food claims as more important than previous generations – with four claims in particular standing out: organic, allergen-free, regenerative and vegan.

“Younger consumers want to know about the products they’re buying,” said Matthew Dillon, co-CEO of OTA. “This isn’t just a short-term trend … these information-seeking shoppers will continue to dig for the facts, and so will their kids. The more we can educate them about their food – and about organic – the better.”

Consumers place high value in organic 

Organic products often command a price premium over non-organic. That’s due to a variety of factors, including generally higher production costs for organic including certification fees, higher processing costs, and limited federal support for organic agriculture and food production.

Today’s price-conscious shopper considers organic to be the food claim that most justifies a higher price. When asked in the survey about the value of various claims, organic was ranked the most valuable, with nearly 60 percent of consumers saying that the organic claim warrants higher prices.

The OTA survey found that the more consumers know about organic, the more willing they are to pay the higher costs.

Consumers who are unaware of organic’s benefits often think that organic does not justify its higher prices; that changes dramatically when that consumer learns about some of the attributes of organic such as exclusions of GMOS, growth hormones, antibiotics and most pesticides. The justification to pay more for organic jumps by some 16 percentage points once the formerly unaware consumer is more knowledgeable about organic.

Knowledge gaps – and opportunities – in the organic aisles 

Today’s shopper puts a high value on the attributes of certified organic. The claims that are most important to consumers – pesticide-free, natural, raised without antibiotics, humanely raised and hormone free – are all supported or partially supported by USDA Organic certification.

But even with increasingly well-informed consumers, some knowledge gaps exist.

Most consumers are aware that organic products do not contain toxic synthetic pesticides or synthetic hormones, or GMOs, but are often unaware of other attributes like sustainable animal welfare practices.  As the world struggles with climate change, a large portion of consumers remain unaware of organic’s ability to contribute to biodiversity, help mitigate the causes of climate change and improve the health of our planet. Less than half of consumers are aware that certified organic agriculture is regulated and enforced by the federal government.

“Education is key to expanding organic,” says Chapman. “Even in this lack of understanding, the survey shows organic incorporates most of what consumers care about. Organic has a tremendous opportunity here to use the trust and the recognition of the USDA Organic seal to help consumers understand even more about its attributes and to expand the organic sector.”

The advantages of organic agriculture, scientific review by FiBL

The German Federal Ministry of Food and Agriculture (BMEL), as part of the Federal Program for Organic Agriculture (BÖL), funded the scientific review of the Research Institute on Organic Agriculture (FiBL) which explores the benefits of this system in the various areas of 'energy', 'climate protection', 'water protection', 'biodiversity', 'health' and 'convenience'.
The analysis of scientific literature demonstrates that organic agriculture - in addition to being subject to specific European regulations and additional official controls, since 1991 (1) - is the most sustainable production system, (2) also from an economic point of view. Energy saving (-50%), reduction of nitrates in aquifers (-50%), increase in biodiversity (+30%) and much more.
1) Organic farming, introduction
Organic farming promotes natural interrelationships in ecosystems, through nutrient cycles that are as integrated as possible since they are based on the use of internal resources and the minimization of nutrient losses. (3) The production strategy is based on the cultivation of varieties less susceptible to diseases and parasites, as well as crop rotations that include legumes and enhance microbiological biodiversity, to promote healthy soils. (4)
This logic system includes the use of beneficial insects, biostimulants and biopreparations based on microorganisms (5) - to control parasites, nourish plants and strengthen the plant microbiota - as well as mechanical weeding, which agriculture 4.0 could automate. Instead of resorting to external factors that are resource and energy intensive, as well as toxic, such as chemically synthesized pesticides and nitrogen fertilizers. The only permitted pesticides have a natural basis. (6)
2) Economic sustainability, energy saving and 'food security'
Sustainability of agricultural practices in the European Union takes on a new dimension, including an economic one, in the face of dizzying increases in the costs of energy and inputs in agriculture. Although organic agriculture requires more frequent physical treatments in some cases, its overall energy consumption per hectare is almost halved compared to that of conventional agriculture. This saving is mainly due to the high energy consumption required for the production of nitrogen fertilizers and pesticides (Müller, FiBL, 2023). (7)
Global food demand is estimated to increase between 35 and 55% in the period 2010-2050, due to population growth. This need can be better met in organic agriculture, compared to conventional agriculture, thanks to its favorable impact on soil productivity and resource savings. Also through the reduction of waste and meat consumption, which will be able to compensate for the lower organic yields thanks to the greater availability of land now used to produce feed (Sanders et al., FiBL, 2023). (8)

3) Biodiversity and agrobiodiversity
Biodiversity and agrobiodiversity – in constant decline, in the Old Continent, due to policies already censured by the European Court of Auditors (9) – can increase significantly, up to and over 30%, thanks to organic agriculture. Which in fact supports the growth of a variety of species, including soil organisms, insects, birds and mammals (Pfiffner, FiBL, 2023). (10)

Agroecology – thanks to the rediscovery, use and rotation of a greater variety of crops, in addition to the ban on the use of herbicides, pesticides and other toxic chemicals – was indeed recommended by FAO (2019) precisely because of its positive effects on diversity and abundance of flora and fauna, in fields and ecosystems. (11) With further benefits for essential ecosystem services (i.e. natural pollination).
The social and economic of groundwater and surface water is one of the objectives of organic agriculture. The FiBL study reports the successful examples of the municipalities of Munich, Leipzig (Canitz) and the district of Lower Franconia, where the systemic application of organic agriculture in the areas of protection and collection of drinking water has allowed a drastic reduction in the levels of nitrates (Hess, 2023). (12)
The first two causes of chemical contamination of water intended for human consumption in Europe, nitrates and pesticides, it is underlined:
– are directly caused by conventional farming practices, and vice versa excluded from organic farming;
– widely exceed the safety limits defined by the European legislator; (13)
– are always associated with cancer risks and often also with genotoxicity, i.e. damage to DNA that is passed on to future generations.
AMR (Anti-Microbial Resistance), of which antibiotic resistance is part, (14) in turn also derives from the contamination of water with veterinary medicines, the use of which in organic livestock farming is strictly limited.
6) Reduction of greenhouse gas emissions, accumulation of carbon in soils
Climate change often sees animal husbandry in the dock. FAO (2019) has in fact recommended five interventions in this area, with the precise aim of reducing greenhouse gas emissions. (15) The 'mainstream media', however, neglects the emissions of 'greenhouse gases' (GHGs) associated with the production and use of easily soluble nitrogen fertilizers. In addition to deforestation linked to monocultures of oil palm and GMO soy. (16)

A systematic review 'Advantages of organic farming for climate protection' (Adrian Müller, Jürn Sanders, FiBL, 2023) - demonstrates how organic agriculture, in comparison with conventional agriculture, can:

– reduce greenhouse gas emissions by at least 25% per hectare of cultivated area, thanks to the non-use of nitrogen fertilizers and pesticides;

– absorb 10% more CO2 in the soil, thanks to the accumulation of humus which absorbs carbon dioxide in the atmosphere to retain it in the soil. With an overall average saving of 1 t CO2-eq/ha. (17)

7) Organic foods, nutritional and health benefits
The FiBL scientific review on the nutritional and health benefits associated with the consumption of organic foods (Anita Frehner, FiBL, 2023) reports the results of various research which show their different composition compared to conventional foods:
- Vitamins. Organic fruit and vegetables have higher levels of vitamin C, fruit has higher levels of vitamins A and E, organic dairy products have higher contents of a-tocopherol (a form of vitamin E);
- minerals. Higher levels of minerals have been found in organic fruits, vegetables and grains;
- unsaturated fatty acids. Organic products of animal origin have higher levels of Omega-3 in dairy products and meat, linoleic acid in dairy products, thanks to the administration of greater quantities of green fodder;
- bioactive compounds. The total levels of bioactive compounds are higher in organic fruit and vegetables, as well as in extra virgin olive oil. (18) Higher levels of antioxidants and phenolic compounds have also been found in organic cereals. 'This is due to the fact that plants in organic farming protect themselves from diseases and parasites with secondary plant substances, not using chemically synthetic pesticides'. (19)
7.1) Organic foods, intestinal microbiota and health
The intestinal microbiota and so the immune system - in addition to overall health - benefits from the consumption of organic foods, as we have seen, thanks to their much greater richness in microorganisms beneficial to health. (20)
Pesticide residues contained in conventional foods, on the other hand, accumulate in the body. As demonstrated by tests conducted on the urine of almost 7.000 residents in various regions of France, where glyphosate was identified in 99,8% of the samples (Grau et al., 2022). (21)
Food additives allowed in processed organic foods, it is worth adding, are six times lower than those allowed in conventional food products. (19) With much more restrictive limits in the case of nitrites and nitrates.
8) Organic foods, consumer prices
Organic productions can guarantee fair remuneration for farmers and workers in agriculture - as seen (Röös et al., 2021. See note 22) - compared to conventional ones. The study 'Organic doesn't have to be more expensive' by Ulrich Hamm (2023) delves into the issue of consumer prices of organic food products compared to conventional ones, highlighting the following:
– both the generality of consumers and those who usually purchase organic foods, in Germany and neighboring countries, consider these products more expensive than conventional ones;
– statistics on the retail market in Germany show that the prices of organic foods are higher than those of non-organic foods, on average, by 20%;
– the inclusion of organic products in supermarkets and discount stores has contributed to the greater accessibility of their prices. Just as it should happen in direct sales markets, due to the absence of intermediaries;
– significant variations, exceeding 100%, are also recorded within both categories of products, organic and non-organic. The prices of conventional 'premium' products often exceed organic equivalents. (23)
9) Share organic values
The generality of consumers continues not to understand the value of the organic supply chain which, from a 'One Health' perspective, expresses the best - for human and environmental health, as well as for animal welfare - compared to 'conventional' supply chains. Consumer trust towards organic certifications is still low or very low (35% of the sample, in a survey conducted by PwC in Germany in 2021) or even zero (10% of participants in the aforementioned study). (23)
Share values of the organic system is essential to stimulate demand for its products and thus the conversion of farms towards the only agri-food production model today capable of offering important benefits not only for individuals and their families but also for communities and future generations.
Bottom-up communication and the activism of each of us is all the more essential since unfortunately, as we have seen, the large agricultural confederations and the global monopolists of pesticides and seeds are instead dragging the institutions towards an antithetical production model, anchored to the unregulated abuse of agrotoxics and GMO monocultures (now behind the mocking acronym NGTs) designed to resist them, only to then poison the planet and all of us. As HB4 wheat ultimately demonstrates. (24)
Karen Ward receives organic women of the year award
Karen Ward, co-Founder and owner of Honest to Goodness, has been honoured with the prestigious title of Organic Woman of the Year.
This award was received  at the 2024 Australian Organic Industry Awards, held Friday, 8 March at the Pullman Melbourne on the Park, East Melbourne.
The awards ceremony recognised Karen Ward’s significant contributions to the organic industry, acknowledging her pivotal role in pioneering a movement towards organic, sustainable practices.
“Receiving the Organic Woman of the Year award is truly an honour and underscores our collective commitment to promoting organic living and sustainability within the industry,” said Ward.
Since its inception in 2002 with a humble market stall in Sydney, Karen’s visionary leadership has propelled Honest to Goodness into a leading Australian-owned company dedicated to promoting organics, ethical sourcing and making healthy choices accessible to all.
“Reflecting on our journey, I’m immensely proud of our team’s dedication to establishing Honest to Goodness as a leader in the organic market, consistently prioritising ethical and sustainable practices,” said Ward.
In addition to Karen’s individual recognition, Honest to Goodness was named as a finalist for Brand of the Year, Business of the Year, and Retailer of the Year.
“We are deeply honoured to be named as a finalist for these prestigious awards. This recognition is a testament to the hard work and dedication of our entire team and our steadfast commitment to providing honest, wholesome, and organic products to consumers nationwide,” said Ward.
The company’s continuous success is supported by consumer demand insights unveiled in the 2023 Australian Organic Market Report, highlighting the surging demand for organic products across Australia.
As revealed in the Australian Organic Market Report 2023, consumer demand for organic products continues to rise, spotlighting the importance of our industry,” said Ward.
With March marking B Corp Month, it’s fitting that Honest to Goodness, a certified BCorp, is celebrated for its commitment to social and environmental impact
Vietnamese organic products to make way to Australia
A delegation of 19 Vietnamese businesses, the Vietnam Organic Agriculture Association (VOAA), and several organic farming trainers will go to Australia to popularise various kinds of organic products from March 18-25.
Sydney (VNA) – A delegation of 19 Vietnamese businesses, the Vietnam Organic Agriculture Association (VOAA), and several organic farming trainers will go to Australia to popularise various kinds of organic products from March 18-25.

The event is organised under an initiative of Mekong Organics, the Export Council of Australia; the Centre for Rural Development-Saemaul Undong under the University of Social Sciences and Humanities, Vietnam National University, HCM City; and the VOAA.

Stories of Vietnamese organic farming together with delicious tastes of such organic products as coconut flower nectar juice, pepper, tea, coffee and cashew will be introduced in Sydney, Bairnsdale and Melbourne.

During their stay, the delegation will visit organic cultivation models in Canberra, New South Wales’ Riverina region and Victoria’s Gippsland region, and meet with several Australian organisations.

The trip aims at helping improve Vietnamese firms’ production and processing capacity, while connecting them with Australian importers and leading organic farming trainers.

According to Director of Mekong Organics Nguyen Van Kien, who is also the Director of the project on enhancing investment and trade promotion of organic agricultural products between Vietnam and Australia, the trip plays an important role in building Australia’s trust in Vietnamese organic products’ quality.

He expressed his hope that Vietnam’s organic cultivation, processing and trade will be improved in the coming time.
How nature-based knowledge can restore local ecosystems and improve community well-being
Organizations in the food and agriculture sector have been looking to nature for inspiration to improve soil health, maintain water quality and foster local food security in the places where they operate.

The evidence is clear that our current food and agriculture systems are severely impacting global greenhouse gas emissions, freshwater usage and deforestation.

In response to these issues, activists, policymakers and corporate executives have been exploring new strategies for making our food systems more resilient and sustainable.

Regenerative agricultural strategies, in particular, can reduce the greenhouse gas emissions from food production, restore local ecosystems and enhance community well-being in specific geographical locations.
But they also require a foundation of nature-based or ecological knowledge in order to be effective. Our recent research sheds light on how organizations can gain and make use of this knowledge.

Regenerating local communities
In the face of current global ecological challenges, there is a need to explore how organizations can help revitalize local communities and ecosystems. Our research on farming organizations on Vancouver Island, British Columbia, aims to explore this.

We studied nine certified organic farming organizations to examine how they were harnessing and using ecological knowledge. Certified organic farming involves business operations that are “sustainable and harmonious with nature.” In B.C., farms are awarded certification annually after a rigorous evaluation process.

Unlike conventional farming practices that prioritize short-term gains through the use of chemical fertilizers, pesticides and monocropping, organic farms focus on long-term health and ecological balance.

The farms we studied were actively engaged in community initiatives aimed at conserving nature and strengthening local food and nutrition security.

Through a series of in-depth interviews with farmers, owners and other key decision-makers, we found these organizations were helping regenerate their local communities by committing to environmental stewardship, and pursuing, acquiring and applying new ecological knowledge.

Environmental stewardship
The leaders and decision-makers of the farming organizations we interviewed were strongly committed to environmental stewardship. Environmental stewardship refers to actions and decisions that prioritize the conservation and enhancement of ecosystems and biodiversity, and the interests of future generations.

This commitment was evident through two main factors. First, decision-makers demonstrated a genuine appreciation for nature, leading them to feel strongly about safeguarding it from harm.

During our interviews, one farmer described how the goals of building sustainable communities and healthy ecosystems influenced her business’ long-term goals. She said:

“In the long term if you don’t have a really solid, values-based business, then you’re going to disappear anyway. [We] put our values behind our environmental footprint and [our efforts to make] this community a better place.”

Second, these leaders had a deep understanding of how their organizations relied on the health of the surrounding ecosystems. The farming practices adopted by them were based on building mutually beneficial relationships between their organizations, local ecosystems and communities.

One board member we interviewed emphasized their reliance on the surrounding ecosystems in an interview, stating that:

“By enhancing biodiversity, we can bring back beneficial ecosystems that directly benefit our farmers. We recognized the importance of pollinators and took steps to increase biodiversity by reintroducing native bees.”

This dedication to environmental stewardship led decision-makers to seek out ecological knowledge about the local ecology to help them foster the creation of healthy and diverse ecosystems.

Restoring local ecosystems and well-being
The decision-makers we interviewed decided to seek out new knowledge to improve their organization’s performance and promote long-term social and ecological well-being. They often did this in response to rising demand from customers and community members for locally sourced, pesticide-free and certified organic products.

Organizations acquired ecological knowledge by collaborating with scientists, academics and non-profit organizations through knowledge exchanges. In our study, for example, some farmers integrated scientific knowledge with their farming methods, resulting in improved crop yield and quality.

Organizations then put their newly acquired ecological knowledge into practice by transforming it into manuals, reports, operating procedures or other similar formats. This allowed the knowledge to be accessed easily and updated as necessary. Applying new knowledge required flexibility, a hands-on learning approach, and the willingness to discard outdated practices.

Once organizations fully integrated new ecological knowledge, they were able to contribute to regenerating their communities, which enhanced financial and ecological sustainability.

A growing urgency
With the world’s population projected to reach 10 billion by 2050, there’s even more of a growing urgency to address environmental impacts and ensure community well-being, ecosystem health and food security, particularly in vulnerable places.

As businesses navigate today’s complex social and environmental challenges, the importance of turning to nature for inspiration is becoming increasingly evident.

Businesses, in particular large corporations, have the responsibility to address the environmental impacts of the food system by committing to promote regenerative farming practices.

By situating themselves within their communities and prioritizing ecological knowledge, businesses have the potential to not only improve their own sustainability, but also to ignite positive change within the communities they operate in.
Good information matters …
But it is increasingly hard to find, with no shortage of media outlets willing to use dodgy tactics to pump up ratings. In a world in which everything is measured in clicks, attention-seeking has become an end in itself.

This is where The Conversation comes in. We produce informative journalism written by academics. Our not-for-profit model means we can remain independent and we work hard to eliminate bias.

If you value our contribution to the community, please consider supporting our end-of-financial-year fundraising goal with a tax-deductible donation.


